Illinois, session 104th, SB2492.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Regulatory Sunset Act is amended by 5changing Section 4.36 and by adding Section 4.41 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 80/4.36)7    Sec. 4.36. Acts repealed on January 1, 2026. The following 8Acts are repealed on January 1, 2026: 9    The Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair Braiding, and 10Nail Technology Act of 1985.11    The Collection Agency Act.12    The Hearing Instrument Consumer Protection Act.13    The Illinois Athletic Trainers Practice Act.14    The Illinois Dental Practice Act. 15    The Illinois Roofing Industry Licensing Act.16    The Illinois Physical Therapy Act.17    The Professional Geologist Licensing Act.18    The Respiratory Care Practice Act.19(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15; 99-204, eff. 7-30-15; 2099-227, eff. 8-3-15; 99-229, eff. 8-3-15; 99-230, eff. 8-3-15; 2199-427, eff. 8-21-15; 99-469, eff. 8-26-15; 99-492, eff. 2212-31-15; 99-642, eff. 7-28-16.)   SB2492 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    (5 ILCS 80/4.41 new)2    Sec. 4.41. Act repealed on January 1, 2031. The following 3Act is repealed on January 1, 2031:4    The Illinois Dental Practice Act. 5    Section 10. The Illinois Dental Practice Act is amended by 6changing Sections 2, 4, 6, 8, 8.05, 11, 13, 14, 16, 17, 18, 718.1, 19, 19.2, 20, 22, 23, 23a, 23b, 24, 25, 25.1, 26, 29, 30, 832, 34, 38.2, 40, 45, 45.5, 48, 49, 51, 54, 54.2, 54.3, and 55 9and by adding Section 4.5 as follows: 10    (225 ILCS 25/2)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2302)11    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)12    Sec. 2. Legislative declaration of public policy. The 13practice of dentistry in the State of Illinois is hereby 14declared to affect the public health, safety and welfare and 15to be subject to regulation and control in the public 16interest. It is further declared to be a matter of public 17interest and concern that the dental profession merit and 18receive the confidence of the public and that only qualified 19persons be permitted to practice dentistry in the State of 20Illinois. Despite the authority granted under this Act 21allowing dentists to delegate the performance of certain 22procedures to dental hygienists and dental assistants, nothing 23contained in this Act shall be construed in any way to relieve 24the supervising dentist from ultimate responsibility for the   SB2492 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1care of the his or her patient. This Act shall be liberally 2construed to carry out these objects and purposes.3    It is further declared to be the public policy of this 4State, pursuant to subsections (h) and (i) of Section 6 of 5Article VII of the Illinois Constitution of 1970, that any 6power or function set forth in this Act to be exercised by the 7State is an exclusive State power or function. Such power or 8function shall not be exercised concurrently, either directly 9or indirectly, by any unit of local government, including home 10rule units, except as otherwise provided in this Act.11(Source: P.A. 89-80, eff. 6-30-95; 89-116, eff. 7-7-95.) 12    (225 ILCS 25/4)13    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)14    Sec. 4. Definitions. As used in this Act:15    "Address of record" means the designated address recorded 16by the Department in the applicant's or licensee's application 17file or license file as maintained by the Department's 18licensure maintenance unit. It is the duty of the applicant or 19licensee to inform the Department of any change of address and 20those changes must be made either through the Department's 21website or by contacting the Department. 22    "Email address of record" means the designated email 23address recorded by the Department in the applicant's 24application file or the licensee's license file, as maintained 25by the Department's licensure maintenance unit.   SB2492 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 2Professional Regulation.3    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 4Professional Regulation.5    "Board" means the Board of Dentistry.6    "Dentist" means a person who has received a general 7license pursuant to subsection paragraph (a) of Section 11 of 8this Act and who may perform any intraoral and extraoral 9procedure required in the practice of dentistry and to whom is 10reserved the responsibilities specified in Section 17.11    "Dental hygienist" means a person who holds a license 12under this Act to perform dental services as authorized by 13Section 18.14    "Dental assistant" means an appropriately trained person 15who, under the supervision of a dentist, provides dental 16services as authorized by Section 17.17    "Expanded function dental assistant" means a dental 18assistant who has completed the training required by Section 1917.1 of this Act. 20    "Dental laboratory" means a person, firm, or corporation 21which:22        (i) engages in making, providing, repairing, or 23    altering dental prosthetic appliances and other artificial 24    materials and devices which are returned to a dentist for 25    insertion into the human oral cavity or which come in 26    contact with its adjacent structures and tissues; and  SB2492 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1        (ii) utilizes or employs a dental technician to 2    provide such services; and3        (iii) performs such functions only for a dentist or 4    dentists.5    "Supervision" means supervision of a dental hygienist or a 6dental assistant requiring that a dentist authorize the 7procedure, remain in the dental facility while the procedure 8is performed, and approve the work performed by the dental 9hygienist or dental assistant before dismissal of the patient, 10but does not mean that the dentist must be present at all times 11in the treatment room.12    "General supervision" means supervision of a dental 13hygienist requiring that the patient be a patient of record, 14that the dentist examine the patient in accordance with 15Section 18 prior to treatment by the dental hygienist, and 16that the dentist authorize the procedures which are being 17carried out by a notation in the patient's record, but not 18requiring that a dentist be present when the authorized 19procedures are being performed. The issuance of a prescription 20to a dental laboratory by a dentist does not constitute 21general supervision.22    "Public member" means a person who is not a health 23professional. For purposes of board membership, any person 24with a significant financial interest in a health service or 25profession is not a public member.26    "Dentistry" means the healing art which is concerned with   SB2492 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1the examination, diagnosis, treatment planning, and care of 2conditions within the human oral cavity and its adjacent 3tissues and structures, as further specified in Section 17.4    "Branches of dentistry" means the various specialties of 5dentistry which, for purposes of this Act, shall be limited to 6the following: endodontics, oral and maxillofacial surgery, 7orthodontics and dentofacial orthopedics, pediatric dentistry, 8periodontics, prosthodontics, oral and maxillofacial 9radiology, and dental anesthesiology.10    "Specialist" means a dentist who has received a specialty 11license pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 11 11(b).12    "Dental technician" means a person who owns, operates, or 13is employed by a dental laboratory and engages in making, 14providing, repairing, or altering dental prosthetic appliances 15and other artificial materials and devices which are returned 16to a dentist for insertion into the human oral cavity or which 17come in contact with its adjacent structures and tissues.18    "Informed consent" means legally valid consent that is 19given by a patient or legal guardian, that is recorded in 20writing or digitally, that authorizes intervention or 21treatment services from the treating dentist, and that 22documents agreement to participate in those services and 23knowledge of the risks, benefits, and alternatives, including 24the decision to withdraw from or decline treatment. 25    "Impaired dentist" or "impaired dental hygienist" means a 26dentist or dental hygienist who is unable to practice with   SB2492 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1reasonable skill and safety because of a physical or mental 2disability as evidenced by a written determination or written 3consent based on clinical evidence, including deterioration 4through the aging process, loss of motor skills, abuse of 5drugs or alcohol, or a psychiatric disorder, of sufficient 6degree to diminish the person's ability to deliver competent 7patient care.8    "Nurse" means a registered professional nurse, a certified 9registered nurse anesthetist licensed as an advanced practice 10registered nurse, or a licensed practical nurse licensed under 11the Nurse Practice Act.12    "Patient of record", except as provided in Section 17.2, 13means a patient for whom the patient's most recent dentist has 14obtained a relevant medical and dental history and on whom the 15dentist has performed a physical examination within the last 16year and evaluated the condition to be treated, including a 17review of the patient's most recent x-rays.18    "Dental responder" means a dentist or dental hygienist who 19is appropriately certified in disaster preparedness, 20immunizations, and dental humanitarian medical response 21consistent with the Society of Disaster Medicine and Public 22Health and training certified by the National Incident 23Management System or the National Disaster Life Support 24Foundation. 25    "Mobile dental van or portable dental unit" means any 26self-contained or portable dental unit in which dentistry is   SB2492 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1practiced that can be moved, towed, or transported from one 2location to another in order to establish a location where 3dental services can be provided.4    "Public health dental hygienist" means a hygienist who 5holds a valid license to practice in the State, has 2 years of 6full-time clinical experience or an equivalent of 4,000 hours 7of clinical experience, and has completed at least 42 clock 8hours of additional structured courses in dental education in 9advanced areas specific to public health dentistry.10    "Public health setting" means a federally qualified health 11center; a federal, State, or local public health facility; 12Head Start; a special supplemental nutrition program for 13Women, Infants, and Children (WIC) facility; a certified 14school-based health center or school-based oral health 15program; a prison; or a long-term care facility.16    "Public health supervision" means the supervision of a 17public health dental hygienist by a licensed dentist who has a 18written public health supervision agreement with that public 19health dental hygienist while working in an approved facility 20or program that allows the public health dental hygienist to 21treat patients, without a dentist first examining the patient 22and being present in the facility during treatment, (1) who 23are eligible for Medicaid or (2) who are uninsured or whose 24household income is not greater than 300% of the federal 25poverty level. 26    "Teledentistry" means the use of telehealth systems and   SB2492 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1methodologies in dentistry and includes patient diagnosis, 2treatment planning, care, and education delivery for a patient 3of record using synchronous and asynchronous communications 4under an Illinois licensed dentist's authority as provided 5under this Act.6    "Moderate sedation" means a drug-induced depression of 7consciousness during which: (1) patients respond purposefully 8to verbal commands, either alone or accompanied by light 9tactile stimulation; (2) no interventions are required to 10maintain a patient's airway and spontaneous ventilation is 11adequate; and (3) cardiovascular function is usually 12maintained.13    "Deep sedation" means a drug-induced depression of 14consciousness during which: (1) patients cannot be easily 15aroused, but respond purposefully following repeated or 16painful stimulation; (2) the ability to independently maintain 17ventilatory function may be impaired; (3) patients may require 18assistance in maintaining airways and spontaneous ventilation 19may be inadequate; and (4) cardiovascular function is usually 20maintained.21    "General anesthesia" means a drug-induced loss of 22consciousness during which: (1) patients are not arousable, 23even by painful stimulation; (2) the ability to independently 24maintain ventilatory function is often impaired; (3) patients 25often require assistance in maintaining airways and positive 26pressure ventilation may be required because of depressed   SB2492 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1spontaneous ventilation or drug-induced depression of 2neuromuscular function; and (4) cardiovascular function may be 3impaired.4    "Venipuncture" means the puncture of a vein as part of a 5medical procedure, typically to withdraw a blood sample or for 6an intravenous catheter for the administration of medication 7or fluids.8    "Enteral route of administration" means administration of 9a drug that is absorbed through the gastrointestinal tract or 10through oral, rectal, or sublingual mucosa.11    "Parenteral route of administration" means administration 12of a drug by which the drug bypasses the gastrointestinal 13tract through intramuscular, intravenous, intranasal, 14submucosal, subcutaneous, or intraosseous methods. 15(Source: P.A. 102-93, eff. 1-1-22; 102-588, eff. 8-20-21; 16102-936, eff. 1-1-23; 103-425, eff. 1-1-24; 103-431, eff. 171-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-628, eff. 7-1-24; 103-902, 18eff. 8-9-24; revised 10-10-24.) 19    (225 ILCS 25/4.5 new)20    Sec. 4.5. Address of record; email address of record. All 21applicants and licensees shall:22    (1) provide a valid address and email address to the 23Department, which shall serve as the address of record and 24email address of record, respectively, upon application for 25licensure or renewal of a license; and  SB2492 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    (2) inform the Department of any change in the applicant 2or licensee's address of record or email address of record 3within 14 days after such change, either through the 4Department's website or by contacting the Department's 5licensure maintenance unit. 6    (225 ILCS 25/6)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2306)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)8    Sec. 6. Board of Dentistry; report Dentistry - report by 9majority required. There is created a Board of Dentistry, to 10be composed of persons designated from time to time by the 11Secretary, as follows:12    Eleven persons, 8 of whom have been dentists for a period 13of 5 years or more; 2 of whom have been dental hygienists for a 14period of 5 years or more, and one public member. None of the 15members shall be an officer, dean, assistant dean, or 16associate dean of a dental college or dental department of an 17institute of learning, nor shall any member be the program 18director of any dental hygiene program. A board member who 19holds a faculty position in a dental school or dental hygiene 20program shall not participate in the examination of applicants 21for licenses from that school or program. The dental 22hygienists shall not participate in the examination of 23applicants for licenses to practice dentistry. The public 24member shall not participate in the examination of applicants 25for licenses to practice dentistry or dental hygiene. The   SB2492 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1board shall annually elect a chairman and vice-chairman who 2shall be dentists.3    Terms for all members shall be for 4 years. Partial terms 4over 2 years in length shall be considered as full terms. A 5member may be reappointed for a successive term, but no member 6shall serve more than 2 full terms in the member's his or her 7lifetime.8    The membership of the Board shall include only residents 9from various geographic areas of this State and shall include 10at least some graduates from various institutions of dental 11education in this State.12    In making appointments to the Board the Secretary shall 13give due consideration to recommendations by organizations of 14the dental profession in Illinois, including the Illinois 15State Dental Society and Illinois Dental Hygienists 16Association, and shall promptly give due notice to such 17organizations of any vacancy in the membership of the Board. 18The Secretary may terminate the appointment of any member for 19cause which in the opinion of the Secretary reasonably 20justifies such termination.21    A vacancy in the membership of the Board shall not impair 22the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform 23all the duties of the Board. Any action to be taken by the 24Board under this Act may be authorized by resolution at any 25regular or special meeting, and each such resolution shall 26take effect immediately. The Board shall meet at least   SB2492 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1quarterly. 2    The members of the Board shall each receive as 3compensation a reasonable sum as determined by the Secretary 4for each day actually engaged in the duties of the office, and 5all legitimate and necessary expense incurred in attending the 6meetings of the Board.7    Members of the Board shall be immune from suit in any 8action based upon any disciplinary proceedings or other 9activities performed in good faith as members of the Board.10(Source: P.A. 99-492, eff. 12-31-15.) 11    (225 ILCS 25/8)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2308)12    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)13    Sec. 8. Necessity for licensure of dentists and 14applications for licenses. No person shall practice dentistry 15without first applying for and obtaining a license for such 16purpose from the Department.17    Applications shall be accompanied by the required fee.18    If an applicant neglects, fails without an approved 19excuse, or refuses to take the next available examination 20offered for licensure under this Act, the fee paid by the 21applicant shall be forfeited to the Department and the 22applicant's application shall expire denied. If an applicant 23fails to pass an examination for licensure under this Act 24within 3 years after filing the applicant's his application, 25the application shall expire 3 years after the date the   SB2492 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1application was filed be denied. However, such applicant may 2thereafter make a new application for examination accompanied 3by the required fee and provide evidence of meeting the 4requirements in effect at the time of the new application.5(Source: P.A. 89-80, eff. 6-30-95; 89-116, eff. 7-7-95; 689-626, eff. 8-9-96.) 7    (225 ILCS 25/8.05)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)9    Sec. 8.05. Social Security Number or Individual Taxpayer 10Identification Number on license application. In addition to 11any other information required to be contained in the 12application, every application for an original license under 13this Act shall include the applicant's Social Security Number 14or Individual Taxpayer Identification Number, which shall be 15retained in the agency's records pertaining to the license. As 16soon as practical, the Department shall assign a customer's 17identification number to each applicant for a license.18    Every application for a renewal or restored license shall 19require the applicant's customer identification number. 20(Source: P.A. 97-400, eff. 1-1-12.) 21    (225 ILCS 25/11)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2311)22    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)23    Sec. 11. Types of dental licenses. The Department shall 24have the authority to issue the following types of licenses,   SB2492 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1to excuse the payment of fees for inactive status, to deliver 2certificates of identification, and to extend pre-license 3practice allowances as follows:4    (a) General licenses. The Department shall issue a license 5authorizing practice as a dentist to any person who qualifies 6for a license under this Act.7    (b) Specialty licenses. The Department shall issue a 8license authorizing practice as a specialist in any particular 9branch of dentistry to any dentist who has complied with the 10requirements established for that particular branch of 11dentistry at the time of making application. The Department 12shall establish additional requirements of any dentist who 13announces or holds himself or herself out to the public as a 14specialist or as being specially qualified in any particular 15branch of dentistry.16    No dentist shall announce or hold himself or herself out 17to the public as a specialist or as being specially qualified 18in any particular branch of dentistry unless the dentist he or 19she is licensed to practice in that specialty of dentistry.20    The fact that any dentist shall announce by card, 21letterhead, or any other form of communication using terms as 22"Specialist", "Practice Limited To", or "Limited to Specialty 23of" with the name of the branch of dentistry practiced as a 24specialty, or shall use equivalent words or phrases to 25announce the same, shall be prima facie evidence that the 26dentist is holding himself or herself out to the public as a   SB2492 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1specialist.2    (c) Temporary training licenses. Persons who wish to 3pursue specialty or other advanced clinical educational 4programs in an approved dental school or a hospital situated 5in this State, or persons who wish to pursue programs of 6specialty training in dental public health in public agencies 7in this State, may receive without examination, in the 8discretion of the Department, a temporary training license. In 9order to receive a temporary training license under this 10subsection, an applicant shall furnish satisfactory proof to 11the Department that:12        (1) The applicant is at least 21 years of age and is of 13    good moral character. In determining moral character under 14    this Section, the Department may take into consideration 15    any felony conviction of the applicant, but such a 16    conviction shall not operate as bar to licensure;17        (2) The applicant has been accepted or appointed for 18    specialty or residency training by an approved hospital 19    situated in this State, by an approved dental school 20    situated in this State, or by a public health agency in 21    this State the training programs of which are recognized 22    and approved by the Department. The applicant shall 23    indicate the beginning and ending dates of the period for 24    which the applicant he or she has been accepted or 25    appointed;26        (3) The applicant is a graduate of a dental school or   SB2492 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    college approved and in good standing in the judgment of 2    the Department. The Department may consider diplomas or 3    certifications of education, or both, accompanied by 4    transcripts of course work and credits awarded to 5    determine if an applicant has graduated from a dental 6    school or college approved and in good standing. The 7    Department may also consider diplomas or certifications of 8    education, or both, accompanied by transcripts of course 9    work and credits awarded in determining whether a dental 10    school or college is approved and in good standing.11    Temporary training licenses issued under this Section 12shall be valid only for the duration of the period of residency 13or specialty training and may be extended or renewed as 14prescribed by rule. The holder of a valid temporary training 15license shall be entitled thereby to perform acts as may be 16prescribed by and incidental to the holder's his or her 17program of residency or specialty training; but the holder he 18or she shall not be entitled to engage in the practice of 19dentistry in this State.20    A temporary training license may be revoked by the 21Department upon proof that the holder has engaged in the 22practice of dentistry in this State outside of the holder's 23his or her program of residency or specialty training, or if 24the holder shall fail to supply the Department, within 10 days 25of its request, with information as to the holder's his or her 26current status and activities in the holder's his or her   SB2492 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1specialty training program.2    (d) Faculty limited licenses. Persons who have received 3full-time appointments to teach dentistry at an approved 4dental school or hospital situated in this State may receive 5without examination, in the discretion of the Department, a 6faculty limited license. In order to receive a faculty limited 7license an applicant shall furnish satisfactory proof to the 8Department that:9        (1) The applicant is at least 21 years of age, is of 10    good moral character, and is licensed to practice 11    dentistry in another state or country; and12        (2) The applicant has a full-time appointment to teach 13    dentistry at an approved dental school or hospital 14    situated in this State.15    Faculty limited licenses issued under this Section shall 16be valid for a period of 3 years and may be extended or 17renewed. The holder of a valid faculty limited license may 18perform acts as may be required by the holder's his or her 19teaching of dentistry. The holder of a faculty limited license 20may practice general dentistry or in the holder's his or her 21area of specialty, but only in a clinic or office affiliated 22with the dental school. The holder of a faculty limited 23license may advertise a specialty degree as part of the 24licensee's ability to practice in a faculty practice. Any 25faculty limited license issued to a faculty member under this 26Section shall terminate immediately and automatically, without   SB2492 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1any further action by the Department, if the holder ceases to 2be a faculty member at an approved dental school or hospital in 3this State.4    The Department may revoke a faculty limited license for a 5violation of this Act or its rules, or if the holder fails to 6supply the Department, within 10 days of its request, with 7information as to the holder's his or her current status and 8activities in the holder's his or her teaching program.9    (e) Inactive status. Any person who holds one of the 10licenses under subsection (a) or (b) of Section 11 or under 11Section 12 of this Act may elect, upon payment of the required 12fee, to place the his or her license on an inactive status and 13shall, subject to the rules of the Department, be excused from 14the payment of renewal fees until the holder he or she notifies 15the Department in writing of the holder's his or her desire to 16resume active status.17    Any licensee requesting restoration from inactive status 18shall be required to pay the current renewal fee, and, upon 19payment, the Department shall be required to restore the his 20or her license, as provided in Section 16 of this Act.21    Any licensee whose license is in an inactive status shall 22not practice in the State of Illinois.23    (f) Certificates of Identification. In addition to the 24licenses authorized by this Section, the Department shall 25deliver to each dentist a certificate of identification in a 26form specified by the Department.  SB2492 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    (g) Pre-license practice allowance. An applicant for a 2general dental license or a temporary training license has a 3pre-license practice allowance to practice dentistry in a 4Commission on Dental Accreditation accredited specialty or 5residency training program for a period of 3 months from the 6starting date of the program. Upon a request from the 7applicant, the Department may extend, in writing, the 8pre-license practice allowance for the specialty or residency 9training program. An applicant practicing dentistry under this 10subsection may only perform acts as are prescribed by and 11incidental to the applicant's program of residency or 12specialty training. An applicant practicing dentistry under 13this subsection must supply the specialty or residency 14training program a copy of the applicant's general license 15application or temporary training license application along 16with proof of certified mail of sending that application to 17the Department.18    The applicant's authority to practice under this 19subsection shall terminate immediately upon: (1) the decision 20of the Department that the applicant failed the examination 21for dental licensure; (2) denial of licensure by the 22Department; or (3) withdrawal of the license application. 23(Source: P.A. 103-425, eff. 1-1-24; 103-687, eff. 7-19-24.) 24    (225 ILCS 25/13)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2313)25    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)  SB2492 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    Sec. 13. Qualifications of applicants for dental 2hygienists. Every person who desires to obtain a license as a 3dental hygienist shall apply to the Department in writing, 4upon forms prepared and furnished by the Department. Each 5application shall contain proof of the particular 6qualifications required of the applicant, shall be verified by 7the applicant, under oath, and shall be accompanied by the 8required examination fee.9    The Department shall require that every applicant for a 10license as a dental hygienist shall:11        (1) (Blank).12        (2) Be a graduate of high school or its equivalent.13        (3) Present satisfactory evidence of having 14    successfully completed 2 academic years of credit at a 15    dental hygiene program accredited by the Commission on 16    Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association.17        (4) Submit evidence that the applicant he or she holds 18    a currently valid certification to perform cardiopulmonary 19    resuscitation. The Department shall adopt rules 20    establishing criteria for certification in cardiopulmonary 21    resuscitation. The rules of the Department shall provide 22    for variances only in instances where the applicant is a 23    person with a physical disability and therefore unable to 24    secure such certification.25        (5) (Blank).26        (6) Present satisfactory evidence that the applicant   SB2492 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    has passed the National Board Dental Hygiene Examination 2    administered by the Joint Commission on National Dental 3    Examinations and has successfully completed an examination 4    conducted by one of the following regional testing 5    services: the Central Regional Dental Testing Service, 6    Inc. (CRDTS), the Southern Regional Testing Agency, Inc. 7    (SRTA), the Western Regional Examining Board (WREB), or 8    the North East Regional Board (NERB). For the purposes of 9    this Section, successful completion shall mean that the 10    applicant has achieved a minimum passing score as 11    determined by the applicable regional testing service. The 12    Secretary may suspend a regional testing service under 13    this item (6) if, after proper notice and hearing, it is 14    established that (i) the integrity of the examination has 15    been breached so as to make future test results unreliable 16    or (ii) the examination is fundamentally deficient in 17    testing clinical competency.18(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.) 19    (225 ILCS 25/14)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2314)20    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)21    Sec. 14. Examination for licensure as dental hygienists. 22The Department shall conduct or authorize examinations of 23applicants for licensure as dental hygienists at such times 24and places as it may determine.25    The examination of applicants for licensure as dental   SB2492 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1hygienists may include both practical demonstrations and 2written and oral tests and shall encompass the subjects 3usually taught in programs of dental hygiene, approved by the 4Department.5    If an applicant fails to pass an examination for licensure 6under this Act within 3 years after filing an his or her 7application, the application shall expire 3 years after the 8date the application was filed be denied. The applicant, 9however, may thereafter make a new application for examination 10accompanied by the required fee and provide evidence of 11meeting the requirements in effect at the time of the new 12application.13(Source: P.A. 89-80, eff. 6-30-95; 89-116, eff. 7-7-95.) 14    (225 ILCS 25/16)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2316)15    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)16    Sec. 16. Expiration, renewal and restoration of licenses. 17The expiration date and renewal date for each license issued 18under this Act shall be set by rule. The renewal period for 19each license issued under this Act shall be 3 years. A dentist 20or dental hygienist may renew a license during the month 21preceding its expiration date by paying the required fee. All 22initial licenses issued during an open renewal period shall 23have the next expiration date. A dentist or dental hygienist 24shall provide proof of current Basic Life Support (BLS) 25certification intended for health care providers at the time   SB2492 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1of renewal as provided by rule. Basic Life Support 2certification training taken as a requirement of this Section 3shall be counted for no more than 4 hours during each licensure 4period towards the continuing education hours under Section 516.1 of this Act. The Department shall provide by rule for 6exemptions from this requirement for a dentist or dental 7hygienist with a physical disability that would preclude the 8dentist or dental hygienist him or her from performing BLS. 9    Any dentist or dental hygienist whose license has expired 10or whose license is on inactive status may have the his license 11restored at any time within 5 years after the expiration 12thereof, upon payment of the required fee and a showing of 13proof of compliance with current continuing education 14requirements, as provided by rule.15    Any person whose license has been expired for more than 5 16years or who has had a his license on inactive status for more 17than 5 years may have the his license restored by making 18application to the Department and filing proof acceptable to 19the Department of taking continuing education and of the 20person's his fitness to have the license restored, including 21sworn evidence certifying to active practice in another 22jurisdiction, and by paying the required restoration fee. A 23person practicing on an expired license is deemed to be 24practicing without a license. However, a holder of a license 25may renew the license within 90 days after its expiration by 26complying with the requirements for renewal and payment of an   SB2492 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1additional fee. A license renewal within 90 days after 2expiration shall be effective retroactively to the expiration 3date. 4    If a person whose license has expired or who has had a his 5license on inactive status for more than 5 years has not 6maintained an active practice satisfactory to the department, 7the Department shall determine, by an evaluation process 8established by rule, the person's his or her fitness to resume 9active status and may require the person to complete a period 10of evaluated clinical experience and may require successful 11completion of a practical examination.12    However, any person whose license expired while the person 13he or she was (i) on active duty with the Armed Forces of the 14United States or called into service or training by the State 15militia or (ii) in training or education under the supervision 16of the United States preliminary to induction into the 17military service, may have the person's his or her license 18renewed, reinstated, or restored without paying any lapsed 19renewal or restoration fee, if within 2 years after 20termination of such service, training, or education other than 21by dishonorable discharge, the person he or she furnishes the 22Department with satisfactory proof that the person he or she 23has been so engaged and that the person's his or her service, 24training, or education has been so terminated.25(Source: P.A. 103-687, eff. 7-19-24.)   SB2492 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    (225 ILCS 25/17)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 17. Acts constituting the practice of dentistry. A 4person practices dentistry, within the meaning of this Act:5        (1) Who represents himself or herself as being able to 6    diagnose or diagnoses, treats, prescribes, or operates for 7    any disease, pain, deformity, deficiency, injury, or 8    physical condition of the human tooth, teeth, alveolar 9    process, gums, or jaw; or10        (2) Who is a manager, proprietor, operator, or 11    conductor of a business where dental operations are 12    performed; or13        (3) Who performs dental operations of any kind; or14        (4) Who uses an X-Ray machine or X-Ray films for 15    dental diagnostic purposes; or16        (5) Who extracts a human tooth or teeth, or corrects 17    or attempts to correct malpositions of the human teeth or 18    jaws; or19        (6) Who offers or undertakes, by any means or method, 20    to diagnose, treat, or remove stains, calculus, and 21    bonding materials from human teeth or jaws; or22        (7) Who uses or administers local or general 23    anesthetics in the treatment of dental or oral diseases or 24    in any preparation incident to a dental operation of any 25    kind or character; or26        (8) Who takes material or digital scans for final   SB2492 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    impressions of the human tooth, teeth, or jaws or performs 2    any phase of any operation incident to the replacement of 3    a part of a tooth, a tooth, teeth, or associated tissues by 4    means of a filling, a crown, a bridge, a denture, or other 5    appliance; or6        (9) Who offers to furnish, supply, construct, 7    reproduce, or repair, or who furnishes, supplies, 8    constructs, reproduces, or repairs, prosthetic dentures, 9    bridges, or other substitutes for natural teeth to the 10    user or prospective user thereof; or11        (10) Who instructs students on clinical matters or 12    performs any clinical operation included in the curricula 13    of recognized dental schools and colleges; or14        (11) Who takes material or digital scans for final 15    impressions of human teeth or places the person's his or 16    her hands in the mouth of any person for the purpose of 17    applying teeth whitening materials, or who takes 18    impressions of human teeth or places the person's his or 19    her hands in the mouth of any person for the purpose of 20    assisting in the application of teeth whitening materials. 21    A person does not practice dentistry when the person he or 22    she discloses to the consumer that the person he or she is 23    not licensed as a dentist under this Act and (i) discusses 24    the use of teeth whitening materials with a consumer 25    purchasing these materials; (ii) provides instruction on 26    the use of teeth whitening materials with a consumer   SB2492 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    purchasing these materials; or (iii) provides appropriate 2    equipment on-site to the consumer for the consumer to 3    self-apply teeth whitening materials. 4    The fact that any person engages in or performs, or offers 5to engage in or perform, any of the practices, acts, or 6operations set forth in this Section, shall be prima facie 7evidence that such person is engaged in the practice of 8dentistry.9    The following practices, acts, and operations, however, 10are exempt from the operation of this Act:11        (a) The rendering of dental relief in emergency cases 12    in the practice of the person's his or her profession by a 13    physician or surgeon, licensed as such under the laws of 14    this State, unless the person he or she undertakes to 15    reproduce or reproduces lost parts of the human teeth in 16    the mouth or to restore or replace lost or missing teeth in 17    the mouth; or18        (b) The practice of dentistry in the discharge of 19    their official duties by dentists in any branch of the 20    Armed Services of the United States, the United States 21    Public Health Service, or the United States Veterans 22    Administration; or23        (c) The practice of dentistry by students in their 24    course of study in dental schools or colleges approved by 25    the Department, when acting under the direction and 26    supervision of dentists acting as instructors; or  SB2492 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1        (d) The practice of dentistry by clinical instructors 2    in the course of their teaching duties in dental schools 3    or colleges approved by the Department:4            (i) when acting under the direction and 5        supervision of dentists, provided that such clinical 6        instructors have instructed continuously in this State 7        since January 1, 1986; or8            (ii) when holding the rank of full professor at 9        such approved dental school or college and possessing 10        a current valid license or authorization to practice 11        dentistry in another country; or12        (e) The practice of dentistry by licensed dentists of 13    other states or countries at meetings of the Illinois 14    State Dental Society or component parts thereof, alumni 15    meetings of dental colleges, or any other like dental 16    organizations, while appearing as clinicians; or17        (f) The use of X-Ray machines for exposing X-Ray films 18    of dental or oral tissues by dental hygienists or dental 19    assistants; or20        (g) The performance of any dental service by a dental 21    assistant, if such service is performed under the 22    supervision and full responsibility of a dentist. In 23    addition, after being authorized by a dentist, a dental 24    assistant may, for the purpose of eliminating pain or 25    discomfort, remove loose, broken, or irritating 26    orthodontic appliances on a patient of record.   SB2492 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1        For purposes of this paragraph (g), "dental service" 2    is defined to mean any intraoral procedure or act which 3    shall be prescribed by rule or regulation of the 4    Department. "Dental service", however, shall not include:5            (1) Any and all diagnosis of or prescription for 6        treatment of disease, pain, deformity, deficiency, 7        injury, or physical condition of the human teeth or 8        jaws, or adjacent structures.9            (2) Removal of, restoration of, or addition to the 10        hard or soft tissues of the oral cavity, except for the 11        placing, carving, and finishing of amalgam 12        restorations and placing, packing, and finishing 13        composite restorations by dental assistants who have 14        had additional formal education and certification. 15            A dental assistant may place, carve, and finish 16        amalgam restorations, place, pack, and finish 17        composite restorations, and place interim restorations 18        if the dental assistant he or she (A) has successfully 19        completed a structured training program as described 20        in item (2) of subsection (g) provided by an 21        educational institution accredited by the Commission 22        on Dental Accreditation, such as a dental school or 23        dental hygiene or dental assistant program, or (B) has 24        at least 4,000 hours of direct clinical patient care 25        experience and has successfully completed a structured 26        training program as described in item (2) of   SB2492 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1        subsection (g) provided by a statewide dental 2        association, approved by the Department to provide 3        continuing education, that has developed and conducted 4        training programs for expanded functions for dental 5        assistants or hygienists. The training program must: 6        (i) include a minimum of 16 hours of didactic study and 7        14 hours of clinical manikin instruction; all training 8        programs shall include areas of study in nomenclature, 9        caries classifications, oral anatomy, periodontium, 10        basic occlusion, instrumentations, pulp protection 11        liners and bases, dental materials, matrix and wedge 12        techniques, amalgam placement and carving, rubber dam 13        clamp placement, and rubber dam placement and removal; 14        (ii) include an outcome assessment examination that 15        demonstrates competency; (iii) require the supervising 16        dentist to observe and approve the completion of 8 17        amalgam or composite restorations; and (iv) issue a 18        certificate of completion of the training program, 19        which must be kept on file at the dental office and be 20        made available to the Department upon request. A 21        dental assistant must have successfully completed an 22        approved coronal polishing and dental sealant course 23        prior to taking the amalgam and composite restoration 24        course. 25            A dentist utilizing dental assistants shall not 26        supervise more than 4 dental assistants at any one   SB2492 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1        time for placing, carving, and finishing of amalgam 2        restorations or for placing, packing, and finishing 3        composite restorations.4            (3) Any and all correction of malformation of 5        teeth or of the jaws.6            (4) Administration of anesthetics, except for 7        monitoring of nitrous oxide, moderate sedation, deep 8        sedation, and general anesthetic as provided in 9        Section 8.1 of this Act, that may be performed only 10        after successful completion of a training program 11        approved by the Department. A dentist utilizing dental 12        assistants shall not supervise more than 4 dental 13        assistants at any one time for the monitoring of 14        nitrous oxide.15            (5) Removal of calculus from human teeth.16            (6) Taking of material or digital scans for final 17        impressions for the fabrication of prosthetic 18        appliances, crowns, bridges, inlays, onlays, or other 19        restorative or replacement dentistry.20            (7) The operative procedure of dental hygiene 21        consisting of oral prophylactic procedures, except for 22        coronal polishing and pit and fissure sealants, which 23        may be performed by a dental assistant who has 24        successfully completed a training program approved by 25        the Department. Dental assistants may perform coronal 26        polishing under the following circumstances: (i) the   SB2492 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1        coronal polishing shall be limited to polishing the 2        clinical crown of the tooth and existing restorations, 3        supragingivally; (ii) the dental assistant performing 4        the coronal polishing shall be limited to the use of 5        rotary instruments using a rubber cup or brush 6        polishing method (air polishing is not permitted); and 7        (iii) the supervising dentist shall not supervise more 8        than 4 dental assistants at any one time for the task 9        of coronal polishing or pit and fissure sealants.10            In addition to coronal polishing and pit and 11        fissure sealants as described in this item (7), a 12        dental assistant who has at least 2,000 hours of 13        direct clinical patient care experience and who has 14        successfully completed a structured training program 15        provided by (1) an educational institution including, 16        but not limited to, a dental school or dental hygiene 17        or dental assistant program, (2) a continuing 18        education provider approved by the Department, or (3) 19        a statewide dental or dental hygienist association 20        that has developed and conducted a training program 21        for expanded functions for dental assistants or 22        hygienists may perform: (A) coronal scaling above the 23        gum line, supragingivally, on the clinical crown of 24        the tooth only on patients 17 years of age or younger 25        who have an absence of periodontal disease and who are 26        not medically compromised or individuals with special   SB2492 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1        needs and (B) intracoronal temporization of a tooth. 2        The training program must: (I) include a minimum of 32 3        hours of instruction in both didactic and clinical 4        manikin or human subject instruction; all training 5        programs shall include areas of study in dental 6        anatomy, public health dentistry, medical history, 7        dental emergencies, and managing the pediatric 8        patient; (II) include an outcome assessment 9        examination that demonstrates competency; (III) 10        require the supervising dentist to observe and approve 11        the completion of 6 full mouth supragingival scaling 12        procedures unless the training was received as part of 13        a Commission on Dental Accreditation approved dental 14        assistant program; and (IV) issue a certificate of 15        completion of the training program, which must be kept 16        on file at the dental office and be made available to 17        the Department upon request. A dental assistant must 18        have successfully completed an approved coronal 19        polishing course prior to taking the coronal scaling 20        course. A dental assistant performing these functions 21        shall be limited to the use of hand instruments only. 22        In addition, coronal scaling as described in this 23        paragraph shall only be utilized on patients who are 24        eligible for Medicaid, who are uninsured, or whose 25        household income is not greater than 300% of the 26        federal poverty level. A dentist may not supervise   SB2492 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1        more than 2 dental assistants at any one time for the 2        task of coronal scaling. This paragraph is inoperative 3        on and after January 1, 2026.4        The limitations on the number of dental assistants a 5    dentist may supervise contained in items (2), (4), and (7) 6    of this paragraph (g) mean a limit of 4 total dental 7    assistants or dental hygienists doing expanded functions 8    covered by these Sections being supervised by one dentist; 9    or10        (h) The practice of dentistry by an individual who:11            (i) has applied in writing to the Department, in 12        form and substance satisfactory to the Department, for 13        a general dental license and has complied with all 14        provisions of Section 9 of this Act, except for the 15        passage of the examination specified in subsection (e) 16        of Section 9 of this Act; or17            (ii) has applied in writing to the Department, in 18        form and substance satisfactory to the Department, for 19        a temporary dental license and has complied with all 20        provisions of subsection (c) of Section 11 of this 21        Act; and22            (iii) has been accepted or appointed for specialty 23        or residency training by a hospital situated in this 24        State; or25            (iv) has been accepted or appointed for specialty 26        training in an approved dental program situated in   SB2492 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1        this State; or2            (v) has been accepted or appointed for specialty 3        training in a dental public health agency situated in 4        this State.5        The applicant shall be permitted to practice dentistry 6    for a period of 3 months from the starting date of the 7    program, unless authorized in writing by the Department to 8    continue such practice for a period specified in writing 9    by the Department.10        The applicant shall only be entitled to perform such 11    acts as may be prescribed by and incidental to the 12    applicant's his or her program of residency or specialty 13    training and shall not otherwise engage in the practice of 14    dentistry in this State.15        The authority to practice shall terminate immediately 16    upon:17            (1) the decision of the Department that the 18        applicant has failed the examination; or19            (2) denial of licensure by the Department; or20            (3) withdrawal of the application.21(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-936, eff. 1-1-23; 22103-425, eff. 1-1-24; 103-431, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 237-1-24; 103-628, eff. 7-1-24.) 24    (225 ILCS 25/18)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2318)25    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)  SB2492 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    Sec. 18. Acts constituting the practice of dental hygiene; 2limitations.3    (a) A person practices dental hygiene within the meaning 4of this Act when the person he or she performs the following 5acts under the supervision of a dentist:6        (i) the operative procedure of dental hygiene, 7    consisting of oral prophylactic procedures;8        (ii) the exposure and processing of X-Ray films of the 9    teeth and surrounding structures;10        (iii) the application to the surfaces of the teeth or 11    gums of chemical compounds designed to be desensitizing 12    agents or effective agents in the prevention of dental 13    caries or periodontal disease;14        (iv) all services which may be performed by a dental 15    assistant as specified by rule pursuant to Section 17, and 16    a dental hygienist may engage in the placing, carving, and 17    finishing of amalgam restorations only after obtaining 18    formal education and certification as determined by the 19    Department;20        (v) administration and monitoring of nitrous oxide 21    upon successful completion of a training program approved 22    by the Department;23        (vi) administration of local anesthetics upon 24    successful completion of a training program approved by 25    the Department; and26        (vii) such other procedures and acts as shall be   SB2492 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    prescribed by rule or regulation of the Department.2    (b) A dental hygienist may be employed or engaged only:3        (1) by a dentist;4        (2) by a federal, State, county, or municipal agency 5    or institution;6        (3) by a public or private school; or7        (4) by a public clinic operating under the direction 8    of a hospital or federal, State, county, municipal, or 9    other public agency or institution.10    (c) When employed or engaged in the office of a dentist, a 11dental hygienist may perform, under general supervision, those 12procedures found in items (i) through (iv) of subsection (a) 13of this Section, provided the patient has been examined by the 14dentist within one year of the provision of dental hygiene 15services, the dentist has approved the dental hygiene services 16by a notation in the patient's record and the patient has been 17notified that the dentist may be out of the office during the 18provision of dental hygiene services.19    (d) If a patient of record is unable to travel to a dental 20office because of illness, infirmity, or imprisonment, a 21dental hygienist may perform, under the general supervision of 22a dentist, those procedures found in items (i) through (iv) of 23subsection (a) of this Section, provided the patient is 24located in a long-term care facility licensed by the State of 25Illinois, a mental health or developmental disability 26facility, or a State or federal prison. The dentist shall   SB2492 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1either personally examine and diagnose the patient or utilize 2approved teledentistry communication methods and determine 3which services are necessary to be performed, which shall be 4contained in an order to the hygienist and a notation in the 5patient's record. Such order must be implemented within 45 6days of its issuance, and an updated medical history and 7observation of oral conditions must be performed by the 8hygienist immediately prior to beginning the procedures to 9ensure that the patient's health has not changed in any manner 10to warrant a reexamination by the dentist.11    (e) School-based oral health care, consisting of and 12limited to oral prophylactic procedures, sealants, and 13fluoride treatments, may be provided by a dental hygienist 14under the general supervision of a dentist. A dental hygienist 15may not provide other dental hygiene treatment in a 16school-based setting, including but not limited to 17administration or monitoring of nitrous oxide or 18administration of local anesthetics. The school-based 19procedures may be performed provided the patient is located at 20a public or private school and the program is being conducted 21by a State, county or local public health department 22initiative or in conjunction with a dental school or dental 23hygiene program. The dentist shall personally examine and 24diagnose the patient and determine which services are 25necessary to be performed, which shall be contained in an 26order to the hygienist and a notation in the patient's record.   SB2492 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1Any such order for sealants must be implemented within 120 2days after its issuance. Any such order for oral prophylactic 3procedures or fluoride treatments must be implemented within 4180 days after its issuance. An updated medical history and 5observation of oral conditions must be performed by the 6hygienist immediately prior to beginning the procedures to 7ensure that the patient's health has not changed in any manner 8to warrant a reexamination by the dentist.9    (f) Without the supervision of a dentist, a dental 10hygienist may perform dental health education functions, 11including instruction in proper oral health care and dental 12hygiene in, for example, a school setting, a long-term care 13facility, and a health fair. In addition, a dental hygienist 14may record case histories and oral conditions observed at any 15time prior to a clinical exam by a dentist.16    (g) The number of dental hygienists practicing in a dental 17office shall not exceed, at any one time, 4 times the number of 18dentists practicing in the office at the time.19    (h) A dental hygienist who is certified as a public health 20dental hygienist may provide services to patients: (1) who are 21eligible for Medicaid or (2) who are uninsured and whose 22household income is not greater than 300% of the federal 23poverty level. A public health dental hygienist may perform 24oral assessments, perform screenings, and provide educational 25and preventative services as provided in subsection (b) of 26Section 18.1 of this Act. The public health dental hygienist   SB2492 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1may not administer local anesthesia or nitrous oxide, or 2place, carve, or finish amalgam restorations or provide 3periodontal therapy under this exception. Each patient must 4sign a consent form that acknowledges that the care received 5does not take the place of a regular dental examination. The 6public health dental hygienist must provide the patient or 7guardian a written referral to a dentist for assessment of the 8need for further dental care at the time of treatment. Any 9indication or observation of a condition that could warrant 10the need for urgent attention must be reported immediately to 11the supervising dentist for appropriate assessment and 12treatment. 13    This subsection (h) is inoperative on and after January 1, 142026.15    (i) A dental hygienist performing procedures listed in 16paragraphs (1) through (4) of subsection (a) of Section 17.1 17must be under the supervision of a dentist, requiring the 18dentist authorizes the procedure, remains in the dental 19facility while the procedure is performed, and approves the 20work performed by the dental hygienist before dismissal of the 21patient, but the dentist is not required to be present at all 22times in the treatment room.23    (j) A dental hygienist may perform actions described in 24paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of Section 17.1 under the 25general supervision of a dentist as described in this Section. 26(Source: P.A. 102-936, eff. 1-1-23; 103-431, eff. 1-1-24.)   SB2492 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    (225 ILCS 25/18.1)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 18.1. Public health dental supervision 4responsibilities.5    (a) When working together in a public health supervision 6relationship, dentists and public health dental hygienists 7shall enter into a public health supervision agreement. The 8dentist providing public health supervision must:9        (1) be available to provide an appropriate level of 10    contact, communication, collaboration, and consultation 11    with the public health dental hygienist and must meet 12    in-person with the public health dental hygienist at least 13    quarterly for review and consultation;14        (2) have specific standing orders or policy guidelines 15    for procedures that are to be carried out for each 16    location or program, although the dentist need not be 17    present when the procedures are being performed;18        (3) provide for the patient's additional necessary 19    care in consultation with the public health dental 20    hygienist;21        (4) file agreements and notifications as required; and22        (5) include procedures for creating and maintaining 23    dental records, including protocols for transmission of 24    all records between the public health dental hygienist and 25    the dentist following each treatment, which shall include   SB2492 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    a notation regarding procedures authorized by the dentist 2    and performed by the public health dental hygienist and 3    the location where those records are to be kept. 4    Each dentist and hygienist who enters into a public health 5supervision agreement must document and maintain a copy of any 6change or termination of that agreement. 7    Dental records shall be owned and maintained by the 8supervising dentist for all patients treated under public 9health supervision, unless the supervising dentist is an 10employee of a public health clinic or federally qualified 11health center, in which case the public health clinic or 12federally qualified health center shall maintain the records. 13    If a dentist ceases to be employed or contracted by the 14facility, the dentist shall notify the facility administrator 15that the public health supervision agreement is no longer in 16effect. A new public health supervision agreement is required 17for the public health dental hygienist to continue treating 18patients under public health supervision. 19    A dentist entering into an agreement under this Section 20may supervise and enter into agreements for public health 21supervision with 4 public health dental hygienists. This shall 22be in addition to the limit of 4 dental hygienists per dentist 23set forth in subsection (g) of Section 18 of this Act. 24    (b) A public health dental hygienist providing services 25under public health supervision may perform only those duties 26within the accepted scope of practice of dental hygiene, as   SB2492 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1follows:2        (1) the operative procedures of dental hygiene, 3    consisting of oral prophylactic procedures, including 4    prophylactic cleanings, application of fluoride, and 5    placement of sealants;6        (2) the exposure and processing of x-ray films of the 7    teeth and surrounding structures; and8        (3) such other procedures and acts as shall be 9    prescribed by rule of the Department.10    Any patient treated under this subsection (b) must be 11examined by a dentist before additional services can be 12provided by a public health dental hygienist. However, if the 13supervising dentist, after consultation with the public health 14hygienist, determines that time is needed to complete an 15approved treatment plan on a patient eligible under this 16Section, then the dentist may instruct the hygienist to 17complete the remaining services prior to an oral examination 18by the dentist. Such instruction by the dentist to the 19hygienist shall be noted in the patient's records. Any 20services performed under this exception must be scheduled in a 21timely manner and shall not occur more than 30 days after the 22first appointment date.23    (c) A public health dental hygienist providing services 24under public health supervision must:25        (1) provide to the patient, parent, or guardian a 26    written plan for referral or an agreement for follow-up   SB2492 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    that records all conditions observed that should be called 2    to the attention of a dentist for proper diagnosis;3        (2) have each patient sign a permission slip or 4    consent form that informs them that the service to be 5    received does not take the place of regular dental 6    checkups at a dental office and is meant for people who 7    otherwise would not have access to the service;8        (3) inform each patient who may require further dental 9    services of that need;10        (4) maintain an appropriate level of contact and 11    communication with the dentist providing public health 12    supervision; and13        (5) complete an additional 4 hours of continuing 14    education in areas specific to public health dentistry 15    yearly.16    (d) Each public health dental hygienist who has rendered 17services under subsections (c), (d), and (e) of this Section 18must complete a summary report at the completion of a program 19or, in the case of an ongoing program, at least annually. The 20report must be completed in the manner specified by the 21Department of Public Health Oral Health Section including 22information about each location where the public health dental 23hygienist has rendered these services. The public health 24dental hygienist must submit the form to the dentist providing 25supervision for the dentist's his or her signature before 26sending it to the Division. The Department of Public Health   SB2492 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1Oral Health Section shall compile and publicize public health 2dental hygienist service data annually. 3    (e) Public health dental hygienists providing services 4under public health supervision may be compensated for their 5work by salary, honoraria, and other mechanisms by the 6employing or sponsoring entity. Nothing in this Act shall 7preclude the entity that employs or sponsors a public health 8dental hygienist from seeking payment, reimbursement, or other 9source of funding for the services provided.10    (e-5) A patient who is provided services under a 11supervision agreement by a public health dental hygienist as 12described in this Section does not need to receive a physical 13examination from a dentist prior to treatment if the public 14health dental hygienist consults with the supervising dentist 15prior to performing the teledentistry service. 16    (f) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2026.17(Source: P.A. 103-431, eff. 1-1-24; 103-902, eff. 8-9-24.) 18    (225 ILCS 25/19)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2319)19    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)20    Sec. 19. Endorsement Licensing applicants from other 21states. Any person who has been lawfully licensed to practice 22dentistry, including the practice of a licensed dental 23specialty, or dental hygiene in another state or territory or 24as a member of the military service which has and maintains a 25standard for the practice of dentistry, a dental specialty, or   SB2492 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1dental hygiene at least equal to that now maintained in this 2State, or if the requirements for licensure in such state or 3territory in which the applicant was licensed were, at the 4date of the applicant's his or her licensure, substantially 5equivalent to the requirements then in force in this State, 6and who has been lawfully engaged in the practice of dentistry 7or dental hygiene for at least 2 years immediately preceding 8the filing of the his or her application to practice in this 9State and who shall deposit with the Department a duly 10attested certificate from the Board of the state or territory 11in which the person he or she is licensed, certifying to the 12fact of the person's his or her licensing and of the person his 13or her being a person of good moral character may, upon payment 14of the required fee, be granted a license to practice 15dentistry, a dental specialty, or dental hygiene in this 16State, as the case may be.17    For the purposes of this Section, "substantially 18equivalent" means that the applicant has presented evidence of 19completion and graduation from an American Dental Association 20accredited dental college or school in the United States or 21Canada, presented evidence that the applicant has passed both 22parts of the National Board Dental Examination, and 23successfully completed an examination conducted by a regional 24testing service.25    Applicants have 3 years from the date of application to 26complete the application process. If the process has not been   SB2492 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1completed in 3 years, the application shall expire 3 years 2after the date of submission of the application be denied, the 3fee shall be forfeited, and the applicant must reapply and 4meet the requirements in effect at the time of reapplication.5(Source: P.A. 103-425, eff. 1-1-24.) 6    (225 ILCS 25/19.2)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)8    Sec. 19.2. Temporary permit for free dental care. 9    (a) Upon Board recommendation, the Department may issue a 10temporary permit authorizing the practice in this State, 11without compensation, of dentistry to an applicant who is 12licensed to practice dentistry in another state, if all of the 13following apply:14        (1) the Department determines that the applicant's 15    services will improve the welfare of Illinois residents 16    who are eligible for Medicaid or who are uninsured and 17    whose household income is not greater than 200% of the 18    federal poverty level;19        (2) the applicant has graduated from a dental program 20    approved by the American Dental Association's Commission 21    on Dental Accreditation and maintains an equivalent 22    authorization to practice dentistry in good standing in 23    the applicant's his or her native licensing jurisdiction 24    during the period of the temporary visiting dentist permit 25    and can furnish the Department a certified letter upon   SB2492 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    request from that jurisdiction attesting to the fact that 2    the applicant has no pending action or violations against 3    the applicant's his or her license;4        (3) the applicant has received an invitation to 5    perform dental care by a charitable organization or has 6    received an invitation to study or receive training on 7    specific dental or clinical subjects or techniques by a 8    licensed continuing education sponsor who is approved by 9    the Department to provide clinical training in the State 10    of Illinois on patients for the welfare of Illinois 11    residents pursuant to subsection (a-5) and is in 12    compliance with the provisions of this Act;13        (4) the applicant will be working pursuant to a 14    collaborative agreement with and under the direct 15    supervision of an Illinois licensed dentist, who is in 16    good standing, during the duration of the program. The 17    supervising dentist must be physically present during all 18    clinical training courses; and19        (5) payment of a fee established by rule.20    The Department may adopt rules to implement this 21subsection.22    (a-5) Upon Board recommendation, after the filing of an 23application, the Department may allow approved continuing 24education sponsors to be licensed to provide live patient 25continuing education clinical training courses if the 26following requirements are met:  SB2492 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1        (1) the continuing education course provides services, 2    without compensation, that will improve the welfare of 3    Illinois residents as described in paragraph (1) of 4    subsection (a). The application to the Board must include 5    the following information for review and approval by the 6    Department:7            (i) a plan of follow-up care and training models;8            (ii) any and all documentation to be signed by the 9        patients, including, but not limited to, waivers, 10        consent forms, and releases;11            (iii) information related to the facilities being 12        utilized, staffing plans, and emergency plans;13            (iv) the process by which patients will be 14        contacted before, during, and after treatment;15            (v) the intended population that will be receiving 16        treatment; and17            (vi) proof of valid malpractice insurance for the 18        approved continuing education sponsor that extends 19        coverage to clinical staff, trainees, and out-of-state 20        permit holders that meet the requirements of 21        subsection (a);22        (2) a valid written collaborative agreement must exist 23    between the temporary visiting dentist and the Illinois 24    licensed dentist co-treating patients under this Section. 25    The collaborative agreement must include a description of 26    the care to be provided and procedures to be performed by   SB2492 Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    the temporary visiting dentist. There shall be no more 2    than 5 trainees per supervising dentist. A copy of this 3    agreement shall become part of the patient's dental record 4    and shall be made available upon request to the 5    Department; and6        (3) payment of a fee established by rule.7    A continuing education sponsor license issued under this 8Section shall be valid for a period of time as provided by 9rule.10    The Department shall adopt rules to implement this 11subsection.12    (b) (Blank). 13    (c) A temporary permit shall be valid for no longer than 5 14consecutive clinical days within 6 months from the date of 15issuance. The temporary permit may be issued once per year to a 16visiting dentist. Temporary permits under subsection (a) may 17be restored no more than one time within 5 years of the initial 18permits issuance. The Department may require an applicant to 19pay a fee for the issuance or restoration of a permit under 20this Section. 21    (d) (Blank).22    (e) The temporary permit shall only permit the holder to 23practice dentistry within the scope of the dental studies and 24in conjunction with one of the following:25        (1) the charitable organization; or26        (2) a continuing education program provided by a   SB2492 Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    continuing education sponsor approved by the Department 2    pursuant to this Section that the permit holder is 3    attending.4    (f) The temporary visiting dentist may not administer 5moderate sedation, deep sedation, or general anesthesia.6    (g) A patient who seeks treatment from a temporary 7visiting dentist must sign a consent form acknowledging that 8the care the patient will receive will be provided by a dentist 9not licensed in the State of Illinois and that the Illinois 10licensed dentist who has the collaborative agreement with the 11temporary visiting dentist will be responsible for all the 12follow-up care associated with the treatment rendered to the 13patient.14    (h) An application for the temporary permit shall be made 15to the Department in writing on forms prescribed by the 16Department and shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable fee 17established by rule.18    (i) An applicant for a temporary permit may be requested 19to appear before the Board to respond to questions concerning 20the applicant's qualifications to receive the permit. An 21applicant's refusal to appear before the Board may be grounds 22for denial of the application by the Department.23    (j) The Secretary may summarily cancel any permit or 24license issued pursuant to this Section without a hearing if 25the Secretary finds that evidence in the Secretary's his or 26her possession indicates that a continuing education sponsor   SB2492 Enrolled- 53 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1licensed under this Section or a temporary permit holder's 2continuation in practice would constitute an imminent danger 3to the public or violate any provision of this Act or its 4rules. If the Secretary summarily cancels a permit or license 5issued pursuant to this Section, the permit holder or licensee 6may petition the Department for a hearing in accordance with 7the provisions of subsection (b) of Section 26 of this Act to 8reinstate the his or her permit or license.9    (k) In addition to terminating any permit or license 10issued pursuant to this Section, the Department may impose a 11monetary penalty not to exceed $10,000 upon the temporary 12permit holder or licensee and may notify any state in which the 13temporary permit holder or licensee has been issued a license 14that the his or her Illinois permit or license has been 15terminated and the reasons for the termination. The monetary 16penalty shall be paid within 60 days after the effective date 17of the order imposing the penalty. The order shall constitute 18a judgment and may be filed and execution had thereon in the 19same manner as any judgment from any court of record. It is the 20intent of the General Assembly that a permit or license issued 21pursuant to this Section shall be considered a privilege and 22not a property right.23(Source: P.A. 102-582, eff. 1-1-22; 103-628, eff. 7-1-24.) 24    (225 ILCS 25/20)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2320)25    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)  SB2492 Enrolled- 54 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    Sec. 20. Display of licenses. Any person licensed to 2practice dentistry or dental hygiene in this State by the 3Department as hereinbefore provided, shall at all times 4display such license or duplicate original thereof in a 5conspicuous place, in the person's his or her office wherein 6the person he or she shall practice such profession, and shall 7further, whenever requested, exhibit such license to any of 8the members of the Department or its authorized agent. Upon 9proof by affidavit, the Department shall provide a duplicate 10if such person establishes that the person's his or her 11license is lost or stolen or that the person he or she 12practices at multiple locations.13(Source: P.A. 89-80, eff. 6-30-95; 89-116, eff. 7-7-95.) 14    (225 ILCS 25/22)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2322)15    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)16    Sec. 22. Returned checks; penalties. Any person who 17delivers a check or other payment to the Department that is 18returned to the Department unpaid by the financial institution 19upon which it is drawn shall pay to the Department, in addition 20to the amount already owed to the Department, a fine of $50. 21The fines imposed by this Section are in addition to any other 22discipline provided under this Act for unlicensed practice or 23practice on a nonrenewed license. The Department shall notify 24the person that payment of fees and fines shall be paid to the 25Department by certified check or money order within 30   SB2492 Enrolled- 55 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1calendar days of the notification. If, after the expiration of 230 days from the date of the notification, the person has 3failed to submit the necessary remittance, the Department 4shall automatically terminate the license or deny the 5application, without hearing. If, after termination or denial, 6the person seeks a license, the person he or she shall apply to 7the Department for restoration or issuance of the license and 8pay all fees and fines due to the Department. The Department 9may establish a fee for the processing of an application for 10restoration of a license to pay all expenses of processing 11this application. The Secretary may waive the fines due under 12this Section in individual cases where the Secretary finds 13that the fines would be unreasonable or unnecessarily 14burdensome.15(Source: P.A. 97-1013, eff. 8-17-12.) 16    (225 ILCS 25/23)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2323)17    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)18    Sec. 23. Refusal, revocation or suspension of dental 19licenses. The Department may refuse to issue or renew, or may 20revoke, suspend, place on probation, reprimand or take other 21disciplinary or non-disciplinary action as the Department may 22deem proper, including imposing fines not to exceed $10,000 23per violation, with regard to any license for any one or any 24combination of the following causes:25        1. Fraud, or misrepresentation, or concealment in   SB2492 Enrolled- 56 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    applying for or procuring a license under this Act, or in 2    connection with applying for renewal of a license under 3    this Act.4        2. Inability to practice with reasonable judgment, 5    skill, or safety as a result of habitual or excessive use 6    or addiction to alcohol, narcotics, stimulants, or any 7    other chemical agent or drug.8        3. Willful or repeated violations of the rules of the 9    Department of Public Health or Department of Nuclear 10    Safety.11        4. Acceptance of a fee for service as a witness, 12    without the knowledge of the court, in addition to the fee 13    allowed by the court.14        5. Division of fees or agreeing to split or divide the 15    fees received for dental services with any person for 16    bringing or referring a patient, except in regard to 17    referral services as provided for under Section 45, or 18    assisting in the care or treatment of a patient, without 19    the knowledge of the patient or the patient's his or her 20    legal representative. Nothing in this item 5 affects any 21    bona fide independent contractor or employment 22    arrangements among health care professionals, health 23    facilities, health care providers, or other entities, 24    except as otherwise prohibited by law. Any employment 25    arrangements may include provisions for compensation, 26    health insurance, pension, or other employment benefits   SB2492 Enrolled- 57 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    for the provision of services within the scope of the 2    licensee's practice under this Act. Nothing in this item 5 3    shall be construed to require an employment arrangement to 4    receive professional fees for services rendered. 5        6. Employing, procuring, inducing, aiding or abetting 6    a person not licensed or registered as a dentist or dental 7    hygienist to engage in the practice of dentistry or dental 8    hygiene. The person practiced upon is not an accomplice, 9    employer, procurer, inducer, aider, or abetter within the 10    meaning of this Act.11        7. Making any misrepresentations or false promises, 12    directly or indirectly, to influence, persuade or induce 13    dental patronage.14        8. Professional connection or association with or 15    lending the licensee's his or her name to another for the 16    illegal practice of dentistry by another, or professional 17    connection or association with any person, firm or 18    corporation holding himself, herself, themselves, or 19    itself out in any manner contrary to this Act.20        9. Obtaining or seeking to obtain practice, money, or 21    any other things of value by false or fraudulent 22    representations, but not limited to, engaging in such 23    fraudulent practice to defraud the medical assistance 24    program of the Department of Healthcare and Family 25    Services (formerly Department of Public Aid) under the 26    Illinois Public Aid Code.  SB2492 Enrolled- 58 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1        10. Practicing under a false or, except as provided by 2    law, an assumed name.3        11. Engaging in dishonorable, unethical, or 4    unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, 5    defraud, or harm the public.6        12. Conviction by plea of guilty or nolo contendere, 7    finding of guilt, jury verdict, or entry of judgment or by 8    sentencing for any crime, including, but not limited to, 9    convictions, preceding sentences of supervision, 10    conditional discharge, or first offender probation, under 11    the laws of any jurisdiction of the United States that (i) 12    is a felony under the laws of this State or (ii) is a 13    misdemeanor, an essential element of which is dishonesty, 14    or that is directly related to the practice of dentistry.15        13. Permitting a dental hygienist, dental assistant or 16    other person under the licensee's his or her supervision 17    to perform any operation not authorized by this Act.18        14. Permitting more than 4 dental hygienists to be 19    employed under the licensee's his or her supervision at 20    any one time.21        15. A violation of any provision of this Act or any 22    rules promulgated under this Act.23        16. Taking impressions for or using the services of 24    any person, firm or corporation violating this Act.25        17. Violating any provision of Section 45 relating to 26    advertising.  SB2492 Enrolled- 59 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1        18. Discipline by another U.S. jurisdiction or foreign 2    nation, if at least one of the grounds for the discipline 3    is the same or substantially equivalent to those set forth 4    within this Act.5        19. Willfully failing to report an instance of 6    suspected child abuse or neglect as required by the Abused 7    and Neglected Child Reporting Act.8        20. Gross negligence in practice under this Act.9        21. The use or prescription for use of narcotics or 10    controlled substances or designated products as listed in 11    the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, in any way other 12    than for therapeutic purposes.13        22. Willfully making or filing false records or 14    reports in the licensee's his or her practice as a 15    dentist, including, but not limited to, false records to 16    support claims against the dental assistance program of 17    the Department of Healthcare and Family Services (formerly 18    Illinois Department of Public Aid).19        23. Professional incompetence as manifested by poor 20    standards of care.21        24. Physical or mental illness, including, but not 22    limited to, deterioration through the aging process, or 23    loss of motor skills which results in a dentist's 24    inability to practice dentistry with reasonable judgment, 25    skill or safety. In enforcing this paragraph, the 26    Department may compel a person licensed to practice under   SB2492 Enrolled- 60 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    this Act to submit to a mental or physical examination 2    pursuant to the terms and conditions of Section 23b.3        25. Gross or repeated irregularities in billing for 4    services rendered to a patient. For purposes of this 5    paragraph 25, "irregularities in billing" shall include:6            (a) Reporting excessive charges for the purpose of 7        obtaining a total payment in excess of that usually 8        received by the dentist for the services rendered.9            (b) Reporting charges for services not rendered.10            (c) Incorrectly reporting services rendered for 11        the purpose of obtaining payment not earned.12        26. Continuing the active practice of dentistry while 13    knowingly having any infectious, communicable, or 14    contagious disease proscribed by rule or regulation of the 15    Department.16        27. Being named as a perpetrator in an indicated 17    report by the Department of Children and Family Services 18    pursuant to the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act, 19    and upon proof by clear and convincing evidence that the 20    licensee has caused a child to be an abused child or 21    neglected child as defined in the Abused and Neglected 22    Child Reporting Act.23        28. Violating the Health Care Worker Self-Referral 24    Act.25        29. Abandonment of a patient.26        30. Mental incompetency as declared by a court of   SB2492 Enrolled- 61 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    competent jurisdiction.2        31. A finding by the Department that the licensee, 3    after having the licensee's his or her license placed on 4    probationary status, has violated the terms of probation. 5        32. Material misstatement in furnishing information to 6    the Department.7        33. Failing, within 60 days, to provide information in 8    response to a written request by the Department in the 9    course of an investigation.10        34. Immoral conduct in the commission of any act, 11    including, but not limited to, commission of an act of 12    sexual misconduct related to the licensee's practice.13        35. Cheating on or attempting to subvert the licensing 14    examination administered under this Act.15        36. A pattern of practice or other behavior that 16    demonstrates incapacity or incompetence to practice under 17    this Act.18        37. Failure to establish and maintain records of 19    patient care and treatment as required under this Act.20        38. Failure to provide copies of dental records as 21    required by law.22        39. Failure of a licensed dentist who owns or is 23    employed at a dental office to give notice of an office 24    closure to the dentist's his or her patients at least 30 25    days prior to the office closure pursuant to Section 50.1.26        40. Failure to maintain a sanitary work environment.  SB2492 Enrolled- 62 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1        41. Failure to comply with the provisions of Section 2    17.2 of this Act. 3    All proceedings to suspend, revoke, place on probationary 4status, or take any other disciplinary action as the 5Department may deem proper, with regard to a license on any of 6the foregoing grounds, must be commenced within 5 years after 7receipt by the Department of a complaint alleging the 8commission of or notice of the conviction order for any of the 9acts described herein. Except for fraud in procuring a 10license, no action shall be commenced more than 7 years after 11the date of the incident or act alleged to have violated this 12Section. The time during which the holder of the license was 13outside the State of Illinois shall not be included within any 14period of time limiting the commencement of disciplinary 15action by the Department.16    All fines imposed under this Section shall be paid within 1760 days after the effective date of the order imposing the fine 18or in accordance with the terms set forth in the order imposing 19the fine.20    The Department may refuse to issue or may suspend the 21license of any person who fails to file a return, or to pay the 22tax, penalty or interest shown in a filed return, or to pay any 23final assessment of tax, penalty or interest, as required by 24any tax Act administered by the Illinois Department of 25Revenue, until such time as the requirements of any such tax 26Act are satisfied.  SB2492 Enrolled- 63 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    Any dentist who has had a his or her license suspended or 2revoked for more than 5 years must comply with the 3requirements for restoration set forth in Section 16 prior to 4being eligible for reinstatement from the suspension or 5revocation.6(Source: P.A. 103-425, eff. 1-1-24; 103-902, eff. 8-9-24.) 7    (225 ILCS 25/23a)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2323a)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)9    Sec. 23a. The Secretary may, upon receipt of a written 10communication from the Secretary of Human Services or the 11Director of the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 12(formerly Department of Public Aid) or Department of Public 13Health, that continuation of practice of a person licensed 14under this Act constitutes an immediate danger to the public, 15immediately suspend the license of such person without a 16hearing. In instances in which the Secretary immediately 17suspends a license under this Section, a hearing upon such 18person's license must be convened by the Board within 15 days 19after such suspension and completed without appreciable delay, 20such hearing held to determine whether to recommend to the 21Secretary that the person's license be revoked, suspended, 22placed on probationary status or reinstated, or such person be 23subject to other disciplinary action. In such hearing, the 24written communication and any other evidence submitted 25therewith may be introduced as evidence against such person;   SB2492 Enrolled- 64 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1provided however, the person, or the person's his or her 2counsel, shall have the opportunity to discredit or impeach 3such evidence and submit evidence rebutting same.4(Source: P.A. 97-1013, eff. 8-17-12.) 5    (225 ILCS 25/23b)6    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)7    Sec. 23b. Requirement for mental and physical examinations 8under certain conditions.9    (a) In enforcing paragraph 24 of Section 23 of this Act, 10the Department may compel any individual who is licensed to 11practice under this Act or who has applied for licensure under 12this Act, to submit to a mental or physical examination and 13evaluation, or both, which may include a substance abuse or 14sexual offender evaluation, as required by and at the expense 15of the Department. The Department shall specifically designate 16the examining physician licensed to practice medicine in all 17of its branches or, if applicable, the multidisciplinary team 18involved in providing the mental or physical examination and 19evaluation, or both. The multidisciplinary team shall be led 20by a physician licensed to practice medicine in all of its 21branches and may consist of one or more or a combination of 22physicians licensed to practice medicine in all of its 23branches, licensed clinical psychologists, licensed clinical 24social workers, licensed clinical professional counselors, and 25other professional and administrative staff. Any examining   SB2492 Enrolled- 65 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1physician or member of the multidisciplinary team may require 2any person ordered to submit to an examination and evaluation 3pursuant to this Section to submit to any additional 4supplemental testing deemed necessary to complete any 5examination or evaluation process, including, but not limited 6to, blood testing, urinalysis, psychological testing, or 7neuropsychological testing. The Department may order the 8examining physician or any member of the multidisciplinary 9team to provide to the Department any and all records, 10including business records, that relate to the examination and 11evaluation, including any supplemental testing performed. The 12Department may order the examining physician or any member of 13the multidisciplinary team to present testimony concerning the 14examination and evaluation of the licensee or applicant, 15including testimony concerning any supplemental testing or 16documents relating to the examination and evaluation. No 17information, report, record, or other documents in any way 18related to the examination and evaluation shall be excluded by 19reason of any common law or statutory privilege relating to 20communications between the licensee or applicant and the 21examining physician or any member of the multidisciplinary 22team. No authorization is necessary from the licensee or 23applicant ordered to undergo an examination and evaluation for 24the examining physician or any member of the multidisciplinary 25team to provide information, reports, records, or other 26documents or to provide any testimony regarding the   SB2492 Enrolled- 66 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1examination and evaluation. The individual to be examined may 2have, at the individual's his or her own expense, another 3physician of the individual's his or her choice present during 4all aspects of this examination. Failure of an individual to 5submit to a mental or physical examination and evaluation, or 6both, when directed shall result in the automatic suspension 7of the individual's his or her license, without hearing, until 8the individual submits to the examination. if the Department 9finds, after notice and hearing, that the refusal to submit to 10the examination.11    (b) If the Department finds an individual unable to 12practice because of the reasons set forth in paragraph 24 of 13Section 23, the Department may require that individual to 14submit to care, counseling, or treatment by physicians 15approved or designated by the Department as a condition, term, 16or restriction for continued, reinstated, or renewed licensure 17to practice, or in lieu of care, counseling, or treatment, the 18Department may file a complaint to immediately suspend, 19revoke, or otherwise discipline the license of the individual. 20An individual whose license was granted, continued, 21reinstated, renewed, disciplined, or supervised subject to 22such terms, conditions, or restrictions, and who fails to 23comply with such terms, conditions, or restrictions, shall be 24referred to the Secretary for a determination as to whether 25the individual shall have the his or her license suspended 26immediately, pending a hearing by the Department.  SB2492 Enrolled- 67 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1(Source: P.A. 97-1013, eff. 8-17-12.) 2    (225 ILCS 25/24)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2324)3    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)4    Sec. 24. Refusal, suspension or revocation of dental 5hygienist license. The Department may refuse to issue or renew 6or may revoke, suspend, place on probation, reprimand or take 7other disciplinary or non-disciplinary action as the 8Department may deem proper, including imposing fines not to 9exceed $10,000 per violation, with regard to any dental 10hygienist license for any one or any combination of the 11following causes:12        1. Fraud or misrepresentation in applying for or 13    procuring a license under this Act, or in connection with 14    applying for renewal of a license under this Act.15        2. Performing any operation not authorized by this 16    Act.17        3. Practicing dental hygiene other than under the 18    supervision of a licensed dentist as provided by this Act.19        4. The willful wilful violation of, or the willful 20    wilful procuring of, or knowingly assisting in the 21    violation of, any Act which is now or which hereafter may 22    be in force in this State relating to the use of 23    habit-forming drugs.24        5. The obtaining of, or an attempt to obtain a 25    license, or practice in the profession, or money, or any   SB2492 Enrolled- 68 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    other thing of value by fraudulent representation.2        6. Gross negligence in performing the operative 3    procedure of dental hygiene.4        7. Active practice of dental hygiene while knowingly 5    having any infectious, communicable, or contagious disease 6    proscribed by rule or regulation of the Department.7        8. Inability to practice with reasonable judgment, 8    skill, or safety as a result of habitual or excessive use 9    or addiction to alcohol, narcotics, stimulants, or any 10    other chemical agent or drug.11        9. Conviction by plea of guilty or nolo contendere, 12    finding of guilt, jury verdict, or entry of judgment or by 13    sentencing of any crime, including, but not limited to, 14    convictions, preceding sentences of supervision, 15    conditional discharge, or first offender probation, under 16    the laws of any jurisdiction of the United States that (i) 17    is a felony or (ii) is a misdemeanor, an essential element 18    of which is dishonesty, or that is directly related to the 19    practice of dental hygiene.20        10. Aiding or abetting the unlicensed practice of 21    dentistry or dental hygiene.22        11. Discipline by another U.S. jurisdiction or a 23    foreign nation, if at least one of the grounds for the 24    discipline is the same or substantially equivalent to 25    those set forth in this Act.26        12. Violating the Health Care Worker Self-Referral   SB2492 Enrolled- 69 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    Act.2        13. Violating the prohibitions of Section 38.1 of this 3    Act.4        14. Engaging in dishonorable, unethical, or 5    unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, 6    defraud, or harm the public.7        15. A finding by the Department that the licensee, 8    after having the licensee's his or her license placed on 9    probationary status, has violated the terms of probation. 10        16. Material misstatement in furnishing information to 11    the Department.12        17. Failing, within 60 days, to provide information in 13    response to a written request by the Department in the 14    course of an investigation.15        18. Immoral conduct in the commission of any act, 16    including, but not limited to, commission of an act of 17    sexual misconduct related to the licensee's practice.18        19. Cheating on or attempting to subvert the licensing 19    examination administered under this Act.20        20. Violations of this Act or of the rules promulgated 21    under this Act.22        21. Practicing under a false or, except as provided by 23    law, an assumed name. 24    The provisions of this Act relating to proceedings for the 25suspension and revocation of a license to practice dentistry 26shall apply to proceedings for the suspension or revocation of   SB2492 Enrolled- 70 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1a license as a dental hygienist.2    All proceedings to suspend, revoke, place on probationary 3status, or take any other disciplinary action as the 4Department may deem proper with regard to a license on any of 5the grounds contained in this Section, must be commenced 6within 5 years after receipt by the Department of a complaint 7alleging the commission of or notice of the conviction order 8for any of the acts described in this Section. Except for fraud 9in procuring a license, no action shall be commenced more than 107 years after the date of the incident or act alleged to have 11violated this Section. The time during which the holder of the 12license was outside the State of Illinois shall not be 13included within any period of time limiting the commencement 14of disciplinary action by the Department.15    All fines imposed under this Section shall be paid within 1660 days after the effective date of the order imposing the fine 17or in accordance with the terms set forth in the order imposing 18the fine.19    Any dental hygienist who has had a his or her license 20suspended or revoked for more than 5 years must comply with the 21requirements for restoration set forth in Section 16 prior to 22being eligible for reinstatement from the suspension or 23revocation. 24(Source: P.A. 99-492, eff. 12-31-15.) 25    (225 ILCS 25/25)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2325)  SB2492 Enrolled- 71 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)2    Sec. 25. Notice of hearing; investigations and informal 3conferences.4    (a) Upon the motion of either the Department or the Board 5or upon the verified complaint in writing of any person 6setting forth facts which if proven would constitute grounds 7for refusal, suspension or revocation of license under this 8Act, the Board shall investigate the actions of any person, 9hereinafter called the respondent, who holds or represents 10that the person he or she holds a license. All such motions or 11complaints shall be brought to the Board.12    (b) Prior to taking an in-person statement from a dentist 13or dental hygienist who is the subject of a complaint, the 14investigator shall inform the dentist or the dental hygienist 15in writing: 16        (1) that the dentist or dental hygienist is the 17    subject of a complaint; 18        (2) that the dentist or dental hygienist need not 19    immediately proceed with the interview and may seek 20    appropriate consultation prior to consenting to the 21    interview; and22        (3) that failure of the dentist or dental hygienist to 23    proceed with the interview shall not prohibit the 24    Department from conducting a visual inspection of the 25    facility. 26    A Department investigator's failure to comply with this   SB2492 Enrolled- 72 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1subsection may not be the sole ground for dismissal of any 2order of the Department filed upon a finding of a violation or 3for dismissal of a pending investigation.4    (b-5) The duly authorized dental investigators of the 5Department shall have the right to enter and inspect, during 6business hours, the business premises of a dentist licensed 7under this Act or of a person who holds oneself himself or 8herself out as practicing dentistry, with due consideration 9for patient care of the subject of the investigation, so as to 10inspect the physical premises and equipment and furnishings 11therein. This right of inspection shall not include inspection 12of business, medical, or personnel records located on the 13premises without a Department subpoena issued in accordance 14with Section 25.1 of this Act or Section 2105-105 of the 15Department of Professional Regulation Law of the Civil 16Administrative Code of Illinois. For the purposes of this 17Section, "business premises" means the office or offices where 18the dentist conducts the practice of dentistry.19    (c) If the Department concludes on the basis of a 20complaint or its initial investigation that there is a 21possible violation of the Act, the Department may: 22        (1) schedule a hearing pursuant to this Act; or 23        (2) request in writing that the dentist or dental 24    hygienist being investigated attend an informal conference 25    with representatives of the Department.26    The request for an informal conference shall contain the   SB2492 Enrolled- 73 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1nature of the alleged actions or inactions that constitute the 2possible violations.3    A dentist or dental hygienist shall be allowed to have 4legal counsel at the informal conference. If the informal 5conference results in a consent order between the accused 6dentist or dental hygienist and the Department, the consent 7order must be approved by the Secretary. However, if the 8consent order would result in a fine exceeding $10,000 or the 9suspension or revocation of the dentist or dental hygienist 10license, the consent order must be approved by the Board and 11the Secretary. Participation in the informal conference by a 12dentist, a dental hygienist, or the Department and any 13admissions or stipulations made by a dentist, a dental 14hygienist, or the Department at the informal conference, 15including any agreements in a consent order that is 16subsequently disapproved by either the Board or the Secretary, 17shall not be used against the dentist, dental hygienist, or 18Department at any subsequent hearing and shall not become a 19part of the record of the hearing.20    (d) The Secretary shall, before suspending, revoking, 21placing on probationary status, or taking any other 22disciplinary action as the Secretary may deem proper with 23regard to any license, at least 30 days prior to the date set 24for the hearing, notify the respondent in writing of any 25charges made and the time and place for a hearing of the 26charges before the Board, direct the respondent him or her to   SB2492 Enrolled- 74 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1file the his or her written answer thereto to the Board under 2oath within 20 days after the service on the respondent him or 3her of such notice and inform the respondent him or her that if 4the respondent he or she fails to file such answer, default 5will be taken against the respondent him or her and the 6respondent's his or her license may be suspended, revoked, 7placed on probationary status, or other disciplinary action 8may be taken with regard thereto, including limiting the 9scope, nature or extent of the respondent's his or her 10practice, as the Secretary may deem proper.11    (e) Such written notice and any notice in such proceedings 12thereafter may be served by delivery personally to the 13respondent, or by registered or certified mail to the 14licensee's address of record or email address of record. to 15the address last theretofore specified by the respondent in 16his or her last notification to the Secretary.17(Source: P.A. 99-492, eff. 12-31-15.) 18    (225 ILCS 25/25.1)19    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)20    Sec. 25.1. Subpoena powers. 21    (a) The Department, upon a determination by the 22chairperson of the Board that reasonable cause exists that a 23violation of one or more of the grounds for discipline set 24forth in Section 23 or Section 24 of this Act has occurred or 25is occurring, may subpoena, without patient consent, the   SB2492 Enrolled- 75 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1dental records of individual patients of dentists and dental 2hygienists licensed under this Act.3    (b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Section, the 4Board and the Department may subpoena copies of hospital, 5medical, or dental records in mandatory report cases alleging 6death or permanent bodily injury when consent to obtain the 7records has not been provided by a patient or a patient's legal 8representative. All records and other information received 9pursuant to a subpoena shall be confidential and shall be 10afforded the same status as information concerning medical 11studies under Part 21 of Article VIII of the Code of Civil 12Procedure. The use of these records shall be restricted to 13members of the Board, the dental coordinator, and appropriate 14Department staff designated by the Secretary for the purpose 15of determining the existence of one or more grounds for 16discipline of the dentist or dental hygienist as provided for 17in Section 23 or Section 24 of this Act.18    (c) Any review of an individual patient's records shall be 19conducted by the Department in strict confidentiality, 20provided that the patient records shall be admissible in a 21disciplinary hearing before the Secretary, the Board, or a 22hearing officer designated by the Department when necessary to 23substantiate the grounds for discipline alleged against the 24dentist or dental hygienist licensed under this Act.25    (d) The Department may provide reimbursement for fees and 26mileage associated with its subpoena power in the same manner   SB2492 Enrolled- 76 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1prescribed by law for judicial procedure in a civil case.2    (e) Nothing in this Section shall be deemed to supersede 3the provisions of Part 21 of Article VIII of the Code of Civil 4Procedure, now or hereafter amended, to the extent applicable.5    (f) All information gathered by the Department during any 6investigation, including information subpoenaed under this Act 7and the investigative file, shall be kept for the confidential 8use of the Secretary, the dental coordinator, the Board's 9attorneys, the dental investigative staff, authorized clerical 10staff, and persons employed by contract to advise the dental 11coordinator or the Department as provided in this Act, except 12that the Department may disclose information and documents to 13(i) a federal, State, or local law enforcement agency pursuant 14to a subpoena in an ongoing criminal investigation or (ii) a 15dental licensing authority of another state or jurisdiction 16pursuant to an official request made by that authority. Any 17information or documents disclosed by the Department to a 18federal, State, or local law enforcement agency may only be 19used by that agency for the investigation and prosecution of a 20criminal offense. Any information or documents disclosed by 21the Department to a dental licensing authority of another 22state or jurisdiction may only be used by that authority for 23investigations and disciplinary proceedings with regards to a 24license. 25    This subsection (f) applies only to causes of action 26accruing on or after the effective date of this amendatory Act   SB2492 Enrolled- 77 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1of the 96th General Assembly. 2(Source: P.A. 96-1221, eff. 7-23-10.) 3    (225 ILCS 25/26)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2326)4    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)5    Sec. 26. Disciplinary actions. 6    (a) In case the respondent, after receiving notice, fails 7to file an answer, the respondent's his or her license may, in 8the discretion of the Secretary, having first received the 9recommendation of the Board, be suspended, revoked, placed on 10probationary status, or the Secretary may take whatever 11disciplinary or non-disciplinary action the Secretary he or 12she may deem proper, including limiting the scope, nature, or 13extent of the person's practice or the imposition of a fine, 14without a hearing, if the act or acts charged constitute 15sufficient grounds for such action under this Act.16    (b) The Secretary may temporarily suspend the license of a 17dentist or dental hygienist without a hearing, simultaneous to 18the institution of proceedings for a hearing under this Act, 19if the Secretary finds that evidence in the Secretary's his or 20her possession indicates that a dentist's or dental 21hygienist's continuation in practice would constitute an 22immediate danger to the public. In the event that the 23Secretary temporarily suspends the license of a dentist or a 24dental hygienist without a hearing, a hearing by the Board 25must be held within 15 days after such suspension has   SB2492 Enrolled- 78 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1occurred.2    (c) The entry of a judgment by any circuit court 3establishing that any person holding a license under this Act 4is a person subject to involuntary admission under the Mental 5Health and Developmental Disabilities Code shall operate as a 6suspension of that license. That person may resume the 7person's his or her practice only upon a finding by the Board 8that the person he or she has been determined to be no longer 9subject to involuntary admission by the court and upon the 10Board's recommendation to the Secretary that the person he or 11she be permitted to resume the person's his or her practice.12(Source: P.A. 99-492, eff. 12-31-15.) 13    (225 ILCS 25/29)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2329)14    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)15    Sec. 29. Recommendations for disciplinary action; action 16action - action by Secretary. The Board may advise the 17Secretary that probation be granted or that other disciplinary 18action, including the limitation of the scope, nature or 19extent of a person's practice, be taken, as it deems proper. If 20disciplinary action other than suspension or revocation is 21taken, the Board may advise that the Secretary impose 22reasonable limitations and requirements upon the respondent to 23insure compliance with the terms of the probation or other 24disciplinary action, including, but not limited to, regular 25reporting by the respondent to the Secretary of the   SB2492 Enrolled- 79 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1respondent's his or her actions, or the respondent's placing 2himself or herself under the care of a qualified physician for 3treatment or limiting the respondent's his or her practice in 4such manner as the Secretary may require.5    The Board shall present to the Secretary a written report 6of its findings and recommendations. A copy of such report 7shall be served upon the respondent, either personally, or by 8registered or certified mail to the licensee's address of 9record, or by email to the licensee's email address of record. 10Within 20 days after such service, the respondent may present 11to the Department a his or her motion in writing for a 12rehearing, specifying the particular ground therefor. If the 13respondent orders from the reporting service and pays for a 14transcript of the record, the time elapsing thereafter and 15before such transcript is ready for delivery to the respondent 16him or her shall not be counted as part of such 20 days.17    At the expiration of the time allowed for filing a motion 18for rehearing the Secretary may take the action recommended by 19the Board. Upon suspension, revocation, placement on 20probationary status, or the taking of any other disciplinary 21action, including the limiting of the scope, nature, or extent 22of one's practice, deemed proper by the Secretary, with regard 23to the license, the respondent shall surrender the 24respondent's his or her license to the Department, if ordered 25to do so by the Department, and upon the respondent's his or 26her failure or refusal to do so, the Department may seize the   SB2492 Enrolled- 80 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1same.2    In all instances under this Act in which the Board has 3rendered a recommendation to the Secretary with respect to a 4particular person, the Secretary shall, to the extent that the 5Secretary he or she disagrees with or takes action contrary to 6the recommendation of the Board, file with the Board the his or 7her specific written reasons of disagreement. Such reasons 8shall be filed within 30 days after the Secretary has taken the 9contrary position.10    Each order of revocation, suspension, or other 11disciplinary action shall contain a brief, concise statement 12of the ground or grounds upon which the Department's action is 13based, as well as the specific terms and conditions of such 14action. The original of this document shall be retained as a 15permanent record by the Board and the Department. In those 16instances where an order of revocation, suspension, or other 17disciplinary action has been rendered by virtue of a dentist's 18or dental hygienist's physical illness, including, but not 19limited to, deterioration through the aging process, or loss 20of motor skill which results in an inability to practice with 21reasonable judgment, skill, or safety, the Department shall 22permit only this document and the record of the hearing 23incident thereto to be observed, inspected, viewed, or copied 24pursuant to court order.25(Source: P.A. 99-492, eff. 12-31-15.)   SB2492 Enrolled- 81 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    (225 ILCS 25/30)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2330)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 30. Appointment of a hearing officer. The Secretary 4shall have the authority to appoint any attorney duly licensed 5to practice law in the State of Illinois to serve as the 6hearing officer if any action for refusal to issue, renew or 7discipline of a license. The hearing officer shall have full 8authority to conduct the hearing. The hearing officer shall 9report his or her findings and recommendations to the Board 10and the Secretary. The Board shall have 60 days from receipt of 11the report to review the report of the hearing officer and 12present its findings of fact, conclusions of law and 13recommendations to the Secretary. If the Board fails to 14present its report within the 60 day period, the Secretary 15shall issue an order based on the report of the hearing 16officer.17    Whenever the Secretary is satisfied that substantial 18justice has not been done in a formal disciplinary action or 19refusal to restore a license, the Secretary he or she may order 20a reexamination or rehearing by the same or other hearing 21officer.22(Source: P.A. 99-492, eff. 12-31-15.) 23    (225 ILCS 25/32)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2332)24    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)25    Sec. 32. Administrative Review Law; application. All final   SB2492 Enrolled- 82 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1administrative decisions of the Department are subject to 2judicial review pursuant to the provisions of the 3Administrative Review Law, and the rules adopted pursuant 4thereto. The term "administrative decision" is defined as in 5Section 3-101 of the Code of Civil Procedure.6    Proceedings for judicial review shall be commenced in the 7circuit court of the county in which the party applying for 8review resides, but if the party is not a resident of this 9State, the venue shall be in Sangamon County.10    The Department shall not be required to certify any record 11to the court or file any answer in court or otherwise appear in 12any court in a judicial review proceeding, unless and until 13the Department has received from the plaintiff payment of the 14costs of furnishing and certifying the record, which costs 15shall be determined by the Department. Exhibits shall be 16certified without cost. Failure on the part of the plaintiff 17to file a receipt in court shall be grounds for dismissal of 18the action. During the pendency and hearing of any and all 19judicial proceedings incident to a disciplinary action any 20sanctions imposed upon the respondent by the Department 21because of acts or omissions related to the delivery of direct 22patient care as specified in the Department's final 23administrative decision, shall as a matter of public policy 24remain in full force and effect in order to protect the public 25pending final resolution of any of the proceedings.26(Source: P.A. 97-1013, eff. 8-17-12.)   SB2492 Enrolled- 83 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    (225 ILCS 25/34)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2334)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 34. Confidential information; disclosure information -4 disclosure. In all hearings conducted under this Act, 5information received, pursuant to law, relating to any 6information acquired by a dentist or dental hygienist in 7attending any patient in a professional character, and 8necessary to professionally serve such patient, shall be 9deemed strictly confidential and shall only be made available, 10either as part of the record of a hearing hereunder or 11otherwise: (1) when such record is required, in its entirety, 12for purposes of judicial review pursuant to this Act; or (2) 13upon the express, written consent of the patient, or in the 14case of the patient's his or her death or disability, the 15patient's his or her personal representative.16(Source: P.A. 84-365.) 17    (225 ILCS 25/38.2)18    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)19    Sec. 38.2. Death or incapacitation of dentist. 20    (a) The executor or administrator of a dentist's estate or 21the legal guardian or authorized representative of a dentist 22who has become incapacitated may contract with another dentist 23or dentists to continue the operations of the deceased or 24incapacitated dentist's practice (if the practice of the   SB2492 Enrolled- 84 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1deceased or incapacitated dentist is a sole proprietorship, a 2corporation where the deceased or incapacitated dentist is the 3sole shareholder, or a limited liability company where the 4deceased or incapacitated dentist is the sole member) for a 5period of one year from the time of death or incapacitation of 6the dentist or until the practice is sold, whichever occurs 7first, if all the following conditions are met:8        (1) The executor, administrator, guardian, or 9    authorized representative executes and files with the 10    Department a notification of death or incapacitation on a 11    form provided by the Department, which notification shall 12    include the following:13            (A) the name and license number of the deceased or 14        incapacitated dentist; 15            (B) the name and address of the dental practice;16            (C) the name, address, and tax identification 17        number of the estate;18            (D) the name and license number of each dentist 19        who will operate the dental practice; and20            (E) an affirmation, under penalty of perjury, that 21        the information provided is true and correct and that 22        the executor, administrator, guardian, or authorized 23        representative understands that any interference by 24        the executor, administrator, guardian, or authorized 25        representative or any agent or assignee of the 26        executor, administrator, guardian, or authorized   SB2492 Enrolled- 85 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1        representative with the contracting dentist's or 2        dentists' practice of dentistry or professional 3        judgment or any other violation of this Section is 4        grounds for an immediate termination of the operations 5        of the dental practice.6        (2) Within 30 days after the death or incapacitation 7    of a dentist, the executor, administrator, guardian, or 8    authorized representative shall send notification of the 9    death or incapacitation by mail to the last known address 10    of each patient of record that has seen the deceased or 11    incapacitated dentist within the previous 12 months, with 12    an explanation of how copies of the practitioner's records 13    may be obtained. This notice may also contain any other 14    relevant information concerning the continuation of the 15    dental practice.16    Continuation of the operations of the dental practice of a 17deceased or incapacitated dentist shall not begin until the 18provisions of this subsection (a) have been met.19    If the practice is not sold within the initial one-year 20period, the provision described in subsection (a) may be 21extended for additional 12-month periods by the Department. 22However, if the extension is approved, the extension shall not 23exceed 3 additional 12-month periods. Each extension must be 24granted prior to the expiration date of the prior extension 25and must be accompanied by a petition detailing the reasons 26for the extension that must be kept on file by the Department.   SB2492 Enrolled- 86 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    (b) The Secretary may terminate the operations of a dental 2practice operating pursuant to this Section if the Department 3has evidence of a violation of this Section or Section 23 or 24 4of this Act. The Secretary must conduct a hearing before 5terminating the operations of a dental practice operating 6pursuant to this Section. At least 15 days before the hearing 7date, the Department (i) must notify, in writing, the 8executor, administrator, guardian, or authorized 9representative at the address provided, pursuant to item (C) 10of subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this Section, and to 11the contracting dentist or dentists at the address of the 12dental practice provided pursuant to item (B) of subdivision 13(1) of subsection (a) of this Section, of any charges made and 14of the time and place of the hearing on the charges before the 15Secretary or hearing officer, as provided in Section 30 of 16this Act, (ii) direct the executor, administrator, guardian, 17or authorized representative to file a his or her written 18answer to such charges with the Secretary under oath within 10 19days after the service on the executor, administrator, 20guardian, or authorized representative of the notice, and 21(iii) inform the executor, administrator, guardian, or 22authorized representative that if there is a failure he or she 23fails to file such answer, a default judgment will be entered 24against the executor, administrator, guardian, or authorized 25representative him or her and the operations of the dental 26practice shall be terminated.   SB2492 Enrolled- 87 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    (c) If the Secretary finds that evidence in the 2Secretary's his or her possession indicates that a violation 3of this Section or Section 23 or 24 of this Act constitutes an 4immediate threat to the public health, safety, or welfare, the 5Secretary may immediately terminate the operations of the 6dental practice without a hearing. Upon service by certified 7mail to the executor, administrator, guardian, or authorized 8representative, at the address provided pursuant to item (C) 9of subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this Section, and the 10contracting dentist or dentists, at the address of the dental 11practice provided pursuant to item (B) of subdivision (1) of 12subsection (a) of this Section, of notice of an order 13immediately terminating the operations of the dental practice, 14the executor, administrator, guardian, or authorized 15representative may petition the Department within 30 days for 16a hearing to take place within 30 days after the petition is 17filed.18    (d) The Department may require, by rule, the submission to 19the Department of any additional information necessary for the 20administration of this Section.21(Source: P.A. 101-162, eff. 7-26-19.) 22    (225 ILCS 25/40)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2340)23    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)24    Sec. 40. Filing license or diploma of another. Any person 25filing or attempting to file as the person's his or her own the   SB2492 Enrolled- 88 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1diploma or license of another, or a forged affidavit of 2identification or qualification, shall be deemed guilty of a 3Class 3 felony, and upon conviction thereof, shall be subject 4to such fine and imprisonment as is made and provided by the 5statutes of this State for the crime of forgery.6(Source: P.A. 84-365.) 7    (225 ILCS 25/45)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2345)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)9    Sec. 45. Advertising. The purpose of this Section is to 10authorize and regulate the advertisement by dentists of 11information which is intended to provide the public with a 12sufficient basis upon which to make an informed selection of 13dentists while protecting the public from false or misleading 14advertisements which would detract from the fair and rational 15selection process.16    Any dentist may advertise the availability of dental 17services in the public media or on the premises where such 18dental services are rendered. Such advertising shall be 19limited to the following information:20        (a) The dental services available;21        (b) Publication of the dentist's name, title, office 22    hours, address and telephone;23        (c) Information pertaining to the dentist's his or her 24    area of specialization, including appropriate board 25    certification or limitation of professional practice;  SB2492 Enrolled- 89 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1        (d) Information on usual and customary fees for 2    routine dental services offered, which information shall 3    include notification that fees may be adjusted due to 4    complications or unforeseen circumstances;5        (e) Announcement of the opening of, change of, absence 6    from, or return to business;7        (f) Announcement of additions to or deletions from 8    professional dental staff;9        (g) The issuance of business or appointment cards;10        (h) Other information about the dentist, dentist's 11    practice or the types of dental services which the dentist 12    offers to perform which a reasonable person might regard 13    as relevant in determining whether to seek the dentist's 14    services. However, any advertisement which announces the 15    availability of endodontics, pediatric dentistry, 16    periodontics, prosthodontics, orthodontics and 17    dentofacial orthopedics, oral and maxillofacial surgery, 18    or oral and maxillofacial radiology by a general dentist 19    or by a licensed specialist who is not licensed in that 20    specialty shall include a disclaimer stating that the 21    dentist does not hold a license in that specialty.22    Any dental practice with more than one location that 23enrolls its dentist as a participating provider in a managed 24care plan's network must verify electronically or in writing 25to the managed care plan whether the provider is accepting new 26patients at each of the specific locations listing the   SB2492 Enrolled- 90 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1provider. The health plan shall remove the provider from the 2directory in accordance with standard practices within 10 3business days after being notified of the changes by the 4provider. Nothing in this paragraph shall void any contractual 5relationship between the provider and the plan.6    It is unlawful for any dentist licensed under this Act to 7do any of the following:8        (1) Use claims of superior quality of care to entice 9    the public.10        (2) Advertise in any way to practice dentistry without 11    causing pain.12        (3) Pay a fee to any dental referral service or other 13    third party who advertises a dental referral service, 14    unless all advertising of the dental referral service 15    makes it clear that dentists are paying a fee for that 16    referral service.17        (4) Advertise or offer gifts as an inducement to 18    secure dental patronage. Dentists may advertise or offer 19    free examinations or free dental services; it shall be 20    unlawful, however, for any dentist to charge a fee to any 21    new patient for any dental service provided at the time 22    that such free examination or free dental services are 23    provided.24        (5) Use the term "sedation dentistry" or similar terms 25    in advertising unless the advertising dentist holds a 26    valid and current permit issued by the Department to   SB2492 Enrolled- 91 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    administer either general anesthesia, deep sedation, or 2    moderate sedation as required under Section 8.1 of this 3    Act. 4    This Act does not authorize the advertising of dental 5services when the offeror of such services is not a dentist. 6Nor shall the dentist use statements which contain false, 7fraudulent, deceptive or misleading material or guarantees of 8success, statements which play upon the vanity or fears of the 9public, or statements which promote or produce unfair 10competition.11    A dentist shall be required to keep a copy of all 12advertisements for a period of 3 years. All advertisements in 13the dentist's possession shall indicate the accurate date and 14place of publication.15    The Department shall adopt rules to carry out the intent 16of this Section.17(Source: P.A. 103-628, eff. 7-1-24.) 18    (225 ILCS 25/45.5)19    Sec. 45.5. Third-party financing for dental services.20    (a) As used in this Section:21    "Agent of a dentist" means a person or company that is 22permitted, authorized, or contracted to act on behalf of a 23dentist or dental office. 24    "Arrange for, broker, or establish" means submitting an 25application to a third-party creditor, lender, or creditor's   SB2492 Enrolled- 92 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1intermediary for approval or rejection on behalf of a patient. 2Submitting an application to a third-party creditor, lender, 3or creditor's intermediary for approval or rejection includes 4patient or a patient's guardian's use of a third-party 5creditor's, lender's, or a creditor's intermediary's 6patient-facing software, weblink, URL, or QR code that is 7customized for with the branding of the dental practice. 8"Arrange for, broker, or establish" does not mean the use of 9third-party marketing or advertising materials that are not 10customized for the dental practice.11    "Financing extended by a third party" includes, but is not 12limited to, an open end credit plan as defined under the 13federal Truth-in-Lending Act (15 U.S.C. 1602), a line of 14credit, or a loan offered or extended by a third party.15    (b) A dentist, employee of a dentist, or agent of a dentist 16may not arrange for, broker, or establish financing extended 17by a third party for a patient.18    (c) A dentist, employee of a dentist, or agent of a dentist 19may not complete for a patient or patient's guardian any 20portion of an application for financing extended by a third 21party. A dentist, employee of a dentist, or agent of a dentist 22may not provide the patient or patient's guardian with an 23electronic device to apply for financing extended by a third 24party.25    (d) A dentist, employee of a dentist, or agent of a dentist 26may not promote, advertise, or provide marketing or   SB2492 Enrolled- 93 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1application materials for financing extended by a third party 2to a patient who:3        (1) has been administered or is under the influence of 4    general anesthesia, conscious sedation, moderate sedation, 5    nitrous oxide;6        (2) is being administered treatment; or7        (3) is in a treatment area, including, but not limited 8    to, an exam room, surgical room, or other area when 9    medical treatment is administered, unless an area 10    separated from the treatment area does not exist.11    (e) A dentist, employee of a dentist, or agent of a dentist 12must provide the following written notice to a patient or 13patient's guardian in at least 14-point font when discussing 14(except to state accepted forms of payment) or providing 15applications for financing extended by a third party:16        "DENTAL SERVICES THIRD-PARTY FINANCING DISCLOSURE17    This is an application for a CREDIT CARD, LINE OF CREDIT, 18OR LOAN to help you finance or pay for your dental treatment. 19This credit card, line of credit, or loan IS NOT A PAYMENT PLAN 20WITH THE DENTIST'S OFFICE. It is a credit card, line of credit, 21or loan from a third-party financing company. Your dentist 22does not work for this company. Your dentist may not complete 23or submit an application for third-party financing on your 24behalf.25    You do not have to apply for a credit card, line of credit, 26or loan. You may pay your dentist for treatment in another   SB2492 Enrolled- 94 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1manner. Your dentist's office may offer its own payment plan. 2You are encouraged to explore any public or private insurance 3options that may cover your dental treatment.4    The lender or creditor may offer a "promotional period" to 5pay back the credit or loan without interest. After any 6promotional period ends, you may be charged interest on 7portions of the balance that have already been paid. If you 8miss a payment or do not pay on time, you may have to pay a 9penalty and a higher interest rate. If you do not pay the money 10that you owe the creditor or lender, then your missed payments 11can appear on your credit report and could hurt your credit 12score. You could also be sued by the creditor or lender.13    If your dentist's office has completed or submitted an 14application for third-party financing on your behalf, you may 15file a complaint by contacting the Illinois Department of 16Financial and Professional Regulation at [Department website] 17or by calling [telephone number for Department]."18    The Department shall make the disclosure required under 19this subsection available on the Department's website in 20English and any other languages deemed necessary by the 21Department.22    (f) The Department may adopt rules to implement this 23Section.24    (g) A violation of this Section is punishable by a fine of 25up to $500 for the first violation and a fine of up to $1,000 26for each subsequent violation. However, the Department may   SB2492 Enrolled- 95 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1take other disciplinary action if the licensee's conduct also 2violates Section 23.3(Source: P.A. 103-733, eff. 1-1-25.) 4    (225 ILCS 25/48)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2348)5    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)6    Sec. 48. Manufacture of dentures, bridges or replacements 7for dentists; prescriptions; order; penalties.8    (a) Any dentist who employs or engages the services of any 9dental laboratory to construct or repair, extraorally, 10prosthetic dentures, bridges, or other replacements for a part 11of a tooth, a tooth, or teeth, or who directs a dental 12laboratory to participate in shade selection for a prosthetic 13appliance, shall furnish such dental laboratory with a written 14prescription on forms prescribed by the Department which shall 15contain: 16        (1) The name and address of the dental laboratory to 17    which the prescription is directed. 18        (2) The patient's name or identification number. If a 19    number is used, the patient's name shall be written upon 20    the duplicate copy of the prescription retained by the 21    dentist. 22        (3) The date on which the prescription was written. 23        (4) A description of the work to be done, including 24    diagrams if necessary. 25        (5) A specification of the type and quality of   SB2492 Enrolled- 96 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    materials to be used. 2        (6) The signature of the dentist and the number of the 3    dentist's his or her license to practice dentistry.4    (b) The dental laboratory receiving a prescription from a 5dentist shall retain the original prescription and the dentist 6shall retain a duplicate copy thereof for inspection at any 7reasonable time by the Department or its duly authorized 8agents, for a period of 3 years in both cases.9    (c) If the dental laboratory receiving a written 10prescription from a dentist engages another dental laboratory 11(hereinafter referred to as "subcontractor") to perform some 12of the services relative to such prescription, it shall 13furnish a written order with respect thereto on forms 14prescribed by the Department which shall contain: 15        (1) The name and address of the subcontractor. 16        (2) A number identifying the order with the original 17    prescription, which number shall be endorsed on the 18    prescription received from the dentist. 19        (3) The date on which the order was written. 20        (4) A description of the work to be done by the 21    subcontractor, including diagrams if necessary. 22        (5) A specification of the type and quality of 23    materials to be used. 24        (6) The signature of an agent of the dental laboratory 25    issuing the order. The subcontractor shall retain the 26    order and the issuer thereof shall retain a duplicate   SB2492 Enrolled- 97 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    copy, attached to the prescription received from the 2    dentist, for inspection by the Department or its duly 3    authorized agents, for a period of 3 years in both cases. 4        (7) A copy of the order to the subcontractor shall be 5    furnished to the dentist.6    (c-5) Regardless of whether the dental laboratory 7manufactures the dental appliance or has it manufactured by a 8subcontractor, the laboratory shall provide to the prescribing 9dentist the (i) location where the work was done and (ii) 10source and original location where the materials were 11obtained. 12    (d) Any dentist who: 13        (1) employs or engages the services of any dental 14    laboratory to construct or repair, extraorally, prosthetic 15    dentures, bridges, or other dental appliances without 16    first providing such dental laboratory with a written 17    prescription; 18        (2) fails to retain a duplicate copy of the 19    prescription for 3 years; or 20        (3) refuses to allow the Department or its duly 21    authorized agents to inspect the dentist's his or her 22    files of prescriptions;23is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and the Department may 24revoke or suspend the dentist's his or her license therefor.25    (e) Any dental laboratory which: 26        (1) furnishes such services to any dentist without   SB2492 Enrolled- 98 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    first obtaining a written prescription therefor from such 2    dentist; 3        (2) acting as a subcontractor as described in (c) 4    above, furnishes such services to any dental laboratory 5    without first obtaining a written order from such dental 6    laboratory; 7        (3) fails to retain the original prescription or 8    order, as the case may be, for 3 years; 9        (4) refuses to allow the Department or its duly 10    authorized agents to inspect its files of prescriptions or 11    orders; or12        (5) fails to provide any information required under 13    this Section to the prescribing dentist; 14is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.15(Source: P.A. 94-1014, eff. 7-7-06.) 16    (225 ILCS 25/49)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2349)17    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)18    Sec. 49. Identification of dentures. 19    (a) Every complete upper and lower denture and removable 20dental prosthesis fabricated by a dentist, or fabricated 21pursuant to a dentist's his or her prescription, shall be 22marked with the name of the patient for whom the prosthesis is 23intended. The markings shall be done during fabrication and 24shall be permanent, legible and cosmetically acceptable. The 25exact location of the markings and the methods used to apply or   SB2492 Enrolled- 99 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1implant them shall be determined by the dentist or dental 2laboratory fabricating the prosthesis. If in the professional 3judgment of the dentist, this full identification is not 4possible, the name may be omitted.5    (b) Any removable dental prosthesis in existence which was 6not marked in accordance with paragraph (a) of this Section at 7the time of fabrication, shall be so marked at the time of any 8subsequent rebasing or duplication.9(Source: P.A. 96-617, eff. 8-24-09.) 10    (225 ILCS 25/54)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2354)11    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)12    Sec. 54. Exemption from civil liability for Peer Review 13Committees. While serving upon any Peer Review Committee, any 14dentist shall not be liable for civil damages as a result of 15the dentist's his or her decisions, findings or 16recommendations in connection with the dentist's his or her 17duties on such committee, except decisions, findings or 18recommendations involving the dentist's willful his or her 19wilful or wanton misconduct. Furthermore, any professional 20organization, association or society of dentists, or component 21thereof, which sponsors, sanctions or otherwise operates or 22participates in peer review activities is hereby afforded the 23same privileges and immunities afforded to any member of the 24peer review committee.25(Source: P.A. 85-946.)   SB2492 Enrolled- 100 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    (225 ILCS 25/54.2)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 54.2. Dental responders. A dentist or dental 4hygienist who is a dental responder is deemed to be acting 5within the bounds of the dentist or dental hygienist's his or 6her license when providing disaster, immunizations, mobile, 7and humanitarian care during a declared local, State, or 8national emergency.9(Source: P.A. 99-25, eff. 1-1-16.) 10    (225 ILCS 25/54.3)11    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)12    Sec. 54.3. Vaccinations.13    (a) Notwithstanding Section 54.2 of this Act, a dentist 14may administer vaccinations upon completion of appropriate 15training set forth by rule and approved by the Department on 16appropriate vaccine storage, proper administration, and 17addressing contraindications and adverse reactions. 18Vaccinations shall be limited to patients 18 years of age and 19older pursuant to a valid prescription or standing order by a 20physician licensed to practice medicine in all its branches 21who, in the course of professional practice, administers 22vaccines to patients. Methods of communication shall be 23established for consultation with the physician in person or 24by telecommunications.  SB2492 Enrolled- 101 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    (b) Vaccinations administered by a dentist shall be 2limited to influenza (inactivated influenza vaccine and live 3attenuated influenza intranasal vaccine). Vaccines shall only 4be administered by the dentist and shall not be delegated to an 5assistant or any other person. Vaccination of a patient by a 6dentist shall be documented in the patient's dental record and 7the record shall be retained in accordance with current dental 8recordkeeping standards. The dentist shall notify the 9patient's primary care physician of each dose of vaccine 10administered to the patient and shall enter all patient level 11data or update the patient's current record. The dentist may 12provide this notice to the patient's physician electronically. 13In addition, the dentist shall enter all patient level data on 14vaccines administered in the immunization data registry 15maintained by the Department of Public Health.16    (c) A dentist shall only provide vaccinations under this 17Section if contracted with and credentialed by the patient's 18health insurance, health maintenance organization, or other 19health plan to specifically provide the vaccinations allowed 20under this Section. Persons enrolled in Medicare or Medicaid 21may only receive the vaccinations allowed for under this 22Section from dentists who are authorized to do so by the 23federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or the 24Department of Healthcare and Family Services.25    (d) The Department shall adopt any rules necessary to 26implement this Section.  SB2492 Enrolled- 102 -LRB104 07527 AAS 17571 b1    (e) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2026.2(Source: P.A. 101-162, eff. 7-26-19.) 3    (225 ILCS 25/55)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2355)4    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)5    Sec. 55. Administrative Procedure Act. The Illinois 6Administrative Procedure Act is hereby expressly adopted and 7incorporated herein as if all of the provisions of that Act 8were included in this Act, except that the provision of 9subsection (d) of Section 10-65 of the Illinois Administrative 10Procedure Act that provides that at hearings the dentist or 11dental hygienist has the right to show compliance with all 12lawful requirements for retention, continuation or renewal of 13the license is specifically excluded. For the purposes of this 14Act the notice required under Section 10-25 of the 15Administrative Procedure Act is deemed sufficient when mailed 16or emailed to the last known address or email address of a 17party.18(Source: P.A. 88-45; 89-80, eff. 6-30-95; 89-116, eff. 197-7-95.) 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Section and Section 5 21take effect upon becoming law.